Judging your own beer is a tough thing to do! I normally pick my own beer apart to a point where you'd think it was undrinkable, but this one...I just really love. There are not really any faults, and I personally have had a great time watching it age and change. It hasn't really mellowed, but the coffee character and spices have changed a bit over the last year, and I'll wax a few bottles and see how they are for a few years to come.
Nous Defions!
Higuain: 26
If you fear the LORD and serve Him and obey His voice, and do not rebel against the commandment of the LORD, then both you and the king who reigns over you will continue following the LORD your God.
Maj.Gen. Kamal Abdul-Marouf, a Sudanese army commander who led the battles in Heglig, said the Sudanese army has killed 1,200 soldiers of South Sudan army during the battles in the area.
So, I was talking to my friend after the show. My friend also does very funny jokes about her Boston mom. We were chatting and I said, “You know, I barely know any comedians who do funny jokes about their dads.” And she said…
If you have a poor performer on your team and have been avoiding pulling the trigger, follow these steps to take care of the problem and move on:
Hey friends,
Nor does Pollan mention that the Humane Society proposed an alternative to the project. The op-ed explains,
6. No saying, "If you are reading this, you're tagged."
By, Rayfield Wiggins
He told the camera, he told “Tattoo from Fantasy Island”, he will beat ADR at Night of Champions.
"The early magazine producers aimed to refine the literary tastes of upper and middle class children and to defend them from low standards of art and morality"(s).
Taken from 'Phantasmagoria' (originally released July 1985. Re-released Feb 2009)
Been on a rant recently about a new production option for the social web in face of ubiquitous, cheaper, faster "Good Enuff" technologies like camera phones and laptop editware.
She was also a very, very jealous woman. Here’s one example of just how unstable her jealousy was. Remember the movie Armageddon? There’s a scene where the crew is blowing off steam the night before they depart for the asteroid. They hit up a strip club and an Aerosmith song, What Kind Of Love Are You On, is playing while they’re in there. Well, that song came on the radio once when Nutjob and I were driving along. I mentioned that it was the song from that scene in the movie. Thus erupted one of the worst fights we ever had. Simply because I remembered a scene from a movie that was based in a strip club. I don’t remember all that was said, but I got so enraged during the argument that I punched her dashboard (I was the passenger) about five times and totally warped the plastic housing for the airbag there. Not my finest moment, and not the last time I would take out my anger on an inanimate object.
like a thought that forms
The folks at NERAX asked me to come speak to their industry session last Friday afternoon. I'd never been to the New England Real Ale eXposition, and it was a chance to see Thomas (and they offered to throw me a room), so I jumped on it.
Poop Head: But Kloipy, we need food to live!
God writes opportunity on one side of the door and responsibility on the other.
“To me the development that has finally reached the Tigh nam Bodach after centuries of seclusion in these remote hills is symptomatic of what is happening in so many of Scotland’s wildest places. Listen carefully and you might just hear the collie’s bark in The Black Glen of the Crooked Stones.”
- January 1971 “My Sweet Lord” single no. 1 around world with Hare Krishna refrain
The Red Cross “Heroes” program is a grassroots fundraising and awareness campaign through which the Red Cross partners with community groups and individuals to raise funds for the vital programs and services that the organization provides to the community.
“The way of love leads all ways
There is no fee for any Industry Day activities. Registration is limited by the venue capacity (maximum of 100 attendees) and early registration is strongly recommended. Organizations are limited to two attendees; however, in the event that the Industry Day is oversubscribed, DARPA reserves the right to limit participation to 1 attendee per organization.
No one is born spinning through aerial silks. It's an incredibly awkward art, at first.
This week's sketch has been designed by Sam
Gah! I have so many worries. I am actually surprised at my willingness to share these thoughts with all those who choose to read my ramblings. It's not easy to admit you are so flawed. It's an uncomfortable thing to say I am scared of how I will feel about my child.
The bottom line is to focus on eating foods in as close to their natural form as possible (for instance, apples, not apple danish). And eat smaller meals, says Breus, but more frequently. Simple, no? And all without counting a single sheep. Sweet dreams.
Potato Lardon Cake, Caramelized Root Vegetables,
Secondly, forgiveness is not saying that it doesn’t matter. It does matter. Why else would we still be hurting after all these years? Forgiveness involves acknowledging the hurt, choosing to forgive and then moving on.
me: "what's fun?"
He was presenting the bank’s annual report, and although not mentioning the Zuma executive by name, he referred to “a strange breed of leaders who are determined to undermine the rule of law and override the Constitution”.
Paper: Roberts Crafts, Core-dinations, AC Cardstock
So are our fears founded?
Mr. David McClean,
It is good to have her home!
Weakness: The Billikens like to control the tempo and that can sometimes lead to low scores. That gets them in trouble. In St. Louis’ losses, they’ve failed to score 70 points in regulation. That’s a troubling statistic. Teams know that if they can push the temp on the Billikens then they have a good chance at winning.
On the program, Jo Jung Suk, who plays the captain of the royal guards to King Lee Jae Ha (played by Lee Seung Gi) was asked who seems to have gotten the short end of the stick between Ha Ji Won and Lee Seung Gi and he answered, “I am a crazy fan of Ha Ji Won, but aren’t I serving Lee Seung Gi? Lee Seung Gi got the short end of the stick.”
It was then she suspected why the President had selected this particular composition. She knew who else was in the room. The Russian ambassador and others from his diplomatic corps were seated so close to her, she could hear them breathe. She knew the strife of recent negotiations between the U.S. and Russia, knew that the delicate balance of power between them sizzled ominously. Of course, Ambassador Olnakoff would know the scherzo she’d just performed. A music scholar himself, a devotee of Chopin, he would surely translate the conflict-to-peace narrative of the music into the political message of reconciliation that Noland must have intended.
guests meet as they come to the theater.
This Sunday I am going to share with you a layout that was done when I went to my "Scrapping Retreat" last October.
40x30" oil on stretched canvas copyright 2012
Meanwhile, at least $1 million will be spent on the visit of Prince Charles and Camilla.
I’m gonna stop doing daily updates. I just can’t fit it into my schedule, and I doubt I can keep this up (my laziness has been showing lately).
I have just received what might be the most devastating news I have heard in a long time. I'm not sure how I can handle this. I'm just hoping that blogging about it will help me cope, as I'm emotionally numb, and need to work through this somehow.
Project Pan 10!
Bjorn Ulvaeus – The blonde haired dude
I went to Christmas breakfast at my sister's house this morning and had about 1/4 cup of scrambled eggs, 4 bites of hash, 3 small bites of hubby's french toast and I was FULL.
I hate party hopping. I always have, always will.
As the embodiment of value in our culture, how can I help but love it, how can I help but measure myself, measure my worth, measure my world with it? How can I help but worship it?
Mom remembers her daughter called shortly after meeting that first boyfriend. Her tooth hurt and she was afraid to go to the dentist — she was always afraid of pain. She called her mom back shortly after and said not to worry, her boyfriend had given her an OxyContin and “she felt great.”
Tickets for the interactive exhibition will go on sale 10am on the 14th June.
Just me, myself and I
Article 69
Left out were the widely held views that the war should never have been fought because it was a war to extend U.S. hegemony or that the U.S. simply had no business fighting in someone else’s civil war. Further, the first “acceptable” viewpoint implied, and the second explicitly stated, that the U.S. didn’t really fight hard to win the war, ignoring the actual intensive level of the U.S. war effort in which North Vietnam’s urban and rural infrastructures were destroyed and three million Vietnamese were killed. (And lest that media debate be seen as a backlash from the Right, it was the liberal New York Times that led it.) Thus there was all the appearance of a free and open media at the same time that the media obscured.
And now the turtle-dove
1 cup kimchi (Korean fermented spicy Napa cabbage or other vegetables)
(5)Other areas necessary to be monitored.
You know that boy I was courting? It seems that all the times you tweeted about your frustrations when I was young… well, you know what they say. The internet is forever! Apparently his dad knows how to use google. Anyway, looks like I’ll be staying home a little longer. Maybe you could start tweeting about my salvation and my new heart. You know, something good…
Me: “What? I’m listening to my iPod,” I say while pointing at my iPod.
10. DON’T be scared!
Just food for thought as we attempt to move forward into yet another Olympic cycle.
don’t lose too much weight.
Security
Flaky Sesame Rolls (Tahinli)
Scott Servais
In an effort to help smooth things out for you, I’ve compiled a list of Do’s and Don’ts for that first meeting, and thrown in a few of the later frequently asked questions as well.
take my hand I won’t let you fall
The whole brother dynamic is fantastic to read. I love how each have lived on their own but are coming back together to raise this little hellion.
Take your two smallest size circles and draw a very small circle in the middle of them (about a half inch in diameter). Then divide them into quarters so that you have a total of eight small pizza pieces each with a bite out of the tip.
Just look around your office room. Are you able to find the things you want in a jiffy? What about the paper clips and staplers?
That is a good reminder for us. As you think about planning for the next ministry season, don’t neglect to include prayer.
Pulled out multiple pieces of wood t
that the true reason behind this global secrecy behind UFOs,
Since I write for Craft Critique, I went to the show as Media this time. Don't worry! See that pink lanyard around my neck? That's for my distributor order so I get you some new products to buy:
So now, we have the humiliation of the President himself saying,
After a fade edit that proves it's not just BBC4 who can be cackhanded at that sort of thing, it's another well drilled soul outfit, this time with backup singers indulging in a lot of pointing. One to the left, then once to the right, always over everyone's heads for that less than personal touch. Not quite sure how to approach this, the middle youth sections of the audience, who by today's standards look about 35, try to look enthusiastic by shifting from side to side indifferently.
She use to own the grocery in my village. The last owner as a matter of fact.
Their many classic metal hits have included:
This year’s VB “Raise A Glass” campaign has exceeded the total donated in last year’s inaugural campaign with $1,281,000 already in the kick. The 1.1 million raised last year came from a combination of direct website driven donations and a marketing promotion whereby $1 from specially branded slabs of VB was added to the total by Foster’s.
TM 14 - Blizzard
Iván Meade – "Why is it important/inspirational to you?"
Santana was taken to the 104 Precinct, and Lewis to the hospital. Lewis is in stable condition; the bullet lodged in his skin and muscle and did not penetrate his chest cavity. Santana is charged with assault in the second degree and criminal possession of a weapon in the second degree; to wit, he essentially called the cops on himself.
For years, a group of friends cooked together once a month. One day, Tamara said, "I'm in my shrimp phase." I asked her about that. For a month, she cooked nothing but shrimp dishes. She learned everything she could about cooking shrimp. The repetition of cooking it every day--sauteed, sauced, breaded, and baked, eventually, she developed a level of mastery. And there lies the eureka moment.
Me: "Yep, he will be"
Social Media ! Social Media !! Its all over the place. No realm of business is complete without a presence on Twitter or Facebook or Diggit or XYZ. Companies can monitor their ‘reputation’ on the social media using tools like UberVU
Please see their note below and give them a try. You won't be sorry.
The 10 questions:
Noteworthy are the ones in Stockholm and Hamburg. Other mosques are in New Jersey, New York and Ohio, the former officer said.
Fortunately, the makers of Scott Pilgrim did not think it any more likely than me and left the trashy comic novel look about it all which made it more surreal than real. And it is fun, too. At first, of course, you think, wtf but then the dorky character of Scott (Michael Cera) grows on you (much like he did in ‘Juno’ where the idea of him impregnating Ellen Page is quite disturbing). And not just him. I must say that Kieran Culkin is by far my favorite Culkin and seeing him play gay is even better than watching his brother Macauley in ‘Party Animals.’
On a slightly different note, lately I've had a lot of emails and comments from readers wanting to connect with me through alternate media (such as Facebook, Twitter and Pinterest - as mentioned above).
--Chase
My cousins, sister and I spent many summer nights camped out on the summerhouse’s sleeping porch. The crickets and cicadas lulled our creek-worn bodies to rest, and we awoke to the scent of bacon and coffee, rejuvenated for another day of swimming and exploring.
Remember in Princess Ben when she had all those secret passageways at her disposal and she DIDN'T use them to spy? Yeah, please no disappointments like that. Also, please no insta-love and slooooow plots. Or wimpy guys.
Place over medium-low heat.
You may have noticed something around here at CultFit. We take no pride in telling what to do, how to do it and how many almonds you should eat in a day on your paleo/granola cruncher diet. It really is this simple: Motivation and Work. Some have asked and the response is. . . There will be no forum here where everyone has a PhD in Kineseology and Bio Mechanics where they fail miserably at critiquing your half ass thruster and kipping pull ups; look elsewhere.
At Troton-Troton energising radius
I haven’t actually enjoyed a movie quite as much as Chroncile in a long time. It was a genuine joy to watch these kids discover what they could do and to see them flourish in these newfound abilities. The shaky cam aspect allows for a viewpoint that can be tricked into thinking that things are actually happening when we of course know that these are simply tricks and computer imaginings of what super-powers could look like. The film also does an excellent job at surprising with its moments. When bad things happen, they have a weight to them that is unexpected and important. You’ll not expect something to happen and it does and it’s heavy. This happens several times, and I found it to be incredibly well done in a way that I haven’t seen in some time.
Start to experience the feeling of your Light Body as being more and more your identity. Let it expand out regularly with longer and longer tentacles of light, reaching farther and farther into the cosmos and out to all beings, human, celestial, and galactic. Feel yourselves residing in many places at once, encompassing many places at once, joining in Light with as many beings at once as you can. You are learning what it is to go back to Oneness.
Alex: This is a very big, and unique, undertaking. What were some of the first milestones that took it from a concept to a real project?
Clay Mask*
There’s just one cardinal rule when it comes to being a bodyguard: no matter how tempting it may be, never, ever get romantically involved with the person you’re protecting. But as these sensual novellas prove, even the most important rules are made to be broken—again and again and again. Join acclaimed authors Lucy Monroe, Jamie Denton, and Elisabeth Naughton as they open the files on an undercover operative who finds a sexy surprise under his covers, a hot case involving mixed messages and mistaken identities, and a mission impossible protecting a provocative beauty who lives to love dangerously. Yeah, it’s a hard job, but someone’s gotta do it.
lounging chair, spacious desk area for homework, a
Finally, I finished this painting today, just in time for our final grad class/critique this coming Tuesday night. One thing I learned most when working on this one was to never, ever go into a piece expecting to finish early. I really rushed into this painting from the start, convinced I'd have it completed in a couple of classes, then on to the next one. Nope, it just doesn't work that way, at least for me, and quite the opposite occurred. As a result of rushing early on, I ended up having to fix a lot of mistakes and some not-so-happy accidents. Most notable was when I was walking to class from my car, through the parking lot, painting in tow while a mighty wind blew. The wind ended up blowing the painting into my jacket zipper causing a minor, but very noticeable patch of scratch marks. I wasn't too happy about this and upon getting to class, promptly mixed what I thought was the right color combination, and instead used the wrong type of blue (without even testing it out on another surface). This began a chain of unfortunate events that evening, as it seemed like each consecutive step I took with the painting made it worse, until I ended up having to basically redo the entire piece, where I once thought I would be finished. This was extremely frustrating, and at one point I wanted to throw it off the nearest bridge, after kicking the crap out of it first. After getting over the original frustration and accepting the fact that I simply need to slow down, I was good. Even my teacher said something to me that I tell my elementary art students all the time, and that was that I shouldn't worry, it's not a race. So, I needed to practice what I preach. Once again, I have to give my wife and her painterly eye, and her kind but sometimes brutal opinion, lots of credit regarding this painting. There were a few times I thought I had completed this, but like Yoda with his cane whacking Luke's behind, she reminded me just how much more needed to be done. Even last night I had thought this was finished, but she told me to sleep on it and to look at it again Sunday morning and see if I still thought it was done. After another hour of reworking the sky and getting another layer of clouds in, it finally looked finished. It should be interesting to hear what my colleagues say at the critique, and there is the possibility of working even more clouds into the piece. I find that letting go of my ego and pride, and accepting kind advice from people has been the absolute best thing I could possibly do in order to grow as an artist. For now though, I'll call it finished.
My salvation and my honor depend on God; he is my mighty rock, my refuge. Trust in him at all times, you people; pour out your hearts to him, for God is our refuge.
Academic disciplines are economic niches and fields of power that employ the production of knowledge as a main currency. Boundaries were erected through differentiating epistemologies that were, nevertheless, compatible and in communication, even if oppositional – ”each defined themselves in ways that emphasized clearly how they were different from other neighboring disciplines” (Wallerstein 1999:221). However, intercommunication between these slightly different colonial-academic epistemologies has always existed. Assuming these boundaries to be impermeable is quite naive. There are patterns, however, that could lead the argument that all of this supposed separation and differentiation Wallerstein insists on generates a dominant mainstream “open culture of social science”.
Here is an excerpt from the book describing some of her thoughts on educating the children. I find them quite remarkable and they really mesh with some of the same goals and objectives that Jeff and I have for our own children. There is a lot to consider. I would love to hear your thoughts.
Okay, seriously, what’s up with the flashbacks? Does this director just not think we’ll be able to understand The Hulk’s plot without showing us Bruce Banner’s past? And for that matter, why change the story like this? Bruce Banner was a normal guy who got caught up in radiation and became a big green monster. THAT’S IT. What is all this nonsense about his father conducting secret experiments on him and trying to kill him as a little kid? It’s just needlessly complex and dark.
At this point we still have to hold the pacifier in his mouth, or continually put it back in, in order for him to keep sucking. He tends to spit it out after just a few minutes. If I need grandma to keep the baby calm while I am trying to get work done she will use the WubbaNub. She will keep sticking it back in.
Also, anyone notice how little makeup she wore on the show. I mean, she’s actually hot when she bothers to drop the ugly tank tops, powder the T zone and put some makeup on. This further confirms my belief models do not know how to put on their own clothes or makeup.
"Modern Englishmen may at first feel some surprise that the "rule of law" (in the sense in which we are now using the term) should be considered as in any way a peculiarity of English institutions, since, at the present day, it may seem to be not so much the property of any one nation as a trait common to every civilized and orderly state. Yet, even if we confine our observation to the existing condition of Europe, we shall soon be convinced that the " rule of law" even in this narrow sense is peculiar to England, or to those countries which, like the United States of America, have inherited English traditions. In every continental community the executive exercises far wider discretionary authority in the matter of arrest, of temporary imprisonment, of expulsion from the territory, and the like, than is either legally claimed or in fact exerted by the government in England; and recent events in Switzerland, which by the way strikingly confirm De Tocqueville's judgment of the national character, remind us that wherever there is discretion there is room for arbitrariness, and that in a republic no less than under a monarchy discretionary authority on the part of the government means insecurity for legal freedom on the part of subjects.
See what you think ....
For instance my Thursday night show "Spanking the Lower East Side" at Nurse Bettie is extremely space-challenged. The bar is small with a maximum capacity of 70. There is a tiny small square stage that measures maybe 4' x 4' and to further complicate things, there is no dressing room. We have the back corner of the bar and pull close two curtains as a makeshift "private" area for ourselves. There is only one bathroom so using that to get oneself ready is out of the question. I even had to create a Do's & Don'ts document with critical information such as, "Don't bring your roller to this show" for new performers.
More pledges
Ok, short story here. When Emily Giffin's first book, "Something Borrowed" came out, myself, my husband (then boyfriend), his sister and her friend were ALL riding together (in my car) to the Cape. And 18hr/2 day trip. God bless his heart (looking back now) for driving us through New Jersey and New York City (where we were all screaming at him and the traffic half the time). Anyway, sister thought it would be a great idea to read outloud from Giffin's book. Well, we all LOVED it. (Except for patient boyfriend, he would just get annoyed with the characters). I thought she articulated relationships and got inside the character's head. At the end of that trip, by the way, Husband decreed no mention of Sex and the City, cute or shopping in the car.
how many halves, I can't be sure,
THE MANHATTAN TRANSFER: THE SYMPHONY SESSIONS (2006)
"Me" update:
Industry will play a major role in defining the curriculum, delivery (guest lectures, industry visits, part-time faculty), work experience (internships and employment). The programme would create professionals who are highly employable and can “hit the ground running”.
It's one thing, if you have 5-6 waiters waiting on you,
Sift the, cocoa powder flour, salt and baking powder into a separate bowl, then stir into the chocolate mixture in 3 additions, mixing well after each addition (scrape any unmixed ingredients from the side of the bowl with a rubber spatula). Finally, stir in the white chocolate until evenly dispersed.
Moonlight revels the murderous scene.
So you get your avatar all gussied up and are ready to attend your first virtual auction. You must register to be a buyer or seller, providing the necessary information. Right now, just for registering, Tophatter is giving a $5 credit voucher to be used towards any auction purchase. If you like them on facebook while in the auction room, you can get 10% off your purchase for that day only.
Since coming home from Florida I have felt different. I haven’t had a heavy load bearing down on me, making me lose my cool. Today Bean noticed and told me that she noticed that I wasn’t angry at the small stuff anymore. For the most part she’s right and the thing is, I haven’t been trying to keep my cool, it’s just happening. That is God’s efficiency. He takes away the burden and the sin associated all at the same time. He replaces it with love. He replaces it with peace. That is efficiency and as I am thinking more, it’s also sufficiency.
Method: Put the onions, garlic, green chillies, tamarind extract, and tomatoes all together in a thick-bottomed vessel. Put the greens over the other ingredients. Add salt. Cover and boil them over moderate heat until tender. Remove from the heat and allow it to cool. The water clinging to the greens when washed will be enough to cook them tender; only if needed, spinkle few drops of water over the greens while it is cooking. Mash the greens with a heavy hand (I prefer this way) or with a dal churner. You may also mash the greens in a blender till well mashed. Heat a frying pan and pour in the oil and ghee mixture into it. When very hot, put the mustard seeds to splutter, black-gram dal to brown lightly, and dried red chillies. When the red chilly turns crisp, pour a spoonful of sauce over it and return immediately to the sauce again. Churn lightly to blend into the sauce. Enjoy either hot or cold with hot rice. You may omit the tamarind extract if you are making the maseel for chappaties or bread.
Yes, showtime begins at 7:15. We are the second group to start. Gotta get to the ice cream maker first!
This was a freebie digital...I saved it several years ago before I realized I need to acknowledge sources when I make my cards....I think I got it from Dover's weekly samples, but I'm not sure. I colored with Copics.
She waited for days for the change in his face
I think that video says it all. $134 is all it takes to provide one bicycle to a person in need. As a result of our Bicycles for Educational Empowerment Program, girls are graduating at the tops of their classes and attendance rates has risen from a discouraging 60% to a stunning 97%. It's incredible what a bicycle can do!
Twenty short minutes from our home is a culinary honey hole. The problem is its popularity is wide spread, so often there is a lengthy wait. Salt of the Earth in Fennville is quintessential farm to table cooking. Recently our party of 5 enjoyed a relaxed 2 hour dinner.
Receiving his school awards.
that the world is beautiful
Her feet had felt wooden as she approached him with the soft drying cloth. And his cold voice had not relieved her any.
Did you 'like' this post? Please recommend it to other readers by selecting the +1 box, below.
Eli is still just as sexy and as in love with Riley but she keeps him at a distance for most of this book. Him and most of the other characters are left on the outside while her bond with Victorian is strengthened.
Mandy Moore singing with some hottie. Not bad. I like this.
2 tablespoons milk
From my two weeks, I came to a couple of conclusions.
So there are weights on both sides of the good/bad scales. I've been shockingly negligent of preparation, though, and while I have a pretty good idea of the essentials of the plot of DFTR I haven't done anything like the in-depth planning that I did for 'Some Kind of Angel'. My biggest worry is the fact that I don't know what the first line's going to be. I intend to start work over breakfast tomorrow morning, just to break the dam, but I'm worried I'll find myself staring at a blank Word doc until I'm late for work.
I sat me down to write a simple story
and it is a lonely place.
I am still a bit sick and have scheduled an appointment to go back to the doctor tomorrow. This sickness is really dragging on and on.
All these pieces in this post are old works I've done over the stretch of years who in either form, style or sensibility represent the new path I'm going down. Solid form, strong shape, deep texture. Ancient past and star-flecked futures.
I loved her plan, of course. I would drive to her place to stay for the weekend. She and her boyfriend/sub "gman" would invite him over. It sounded simple on paper. Ha! It had taken careful, meticulous planning, and I was a nervous wreck!
North by Northwest - Come for SXSW, eat at NXNW - almost too silly to be true. But this is one of the very few non-chain, upscale eateries in the area, it's consistently decent, and they brew their own beer. 'nuff said.
Last Thursday we welcomed our darling baby girl into the world. She came three weeks early but, thankfully, is the picture of health. I could not have asked for a better labor and delivery… everything went so fast. I found the second time around to be much, much easier.
As promotional as the copy might be, the magazine maintains its integrity with the reviews they give the different media each week. Just the week before, they might have run an article gushing about the utter beauty of Norman Mailer’s authorial work, but then the book critic might skewer his latest novel about the childhood of Hitler. These critics don’t pander to popular taste, claiming that something is good just because the crowd likes it. Often they mock reality TV. They deride many comedies that end up number one at the box office. I don’t know when they last gave a good review to anything Ben Stiller has done (maybe Tropic Thunder).
“Jeremy,” he said. “Why are you always trying to fight me?”
Most important, emotion trumps everything. If you're in a terrible light situation and just have whatever camera, shoot it anyway. Get it. Even if it's grainy and you can hardly see anything. If you see the expression on your child's face or something that will remind you of the moment, you will have a photo and you got it. You may not put it in your portfolio, but they are the memories. Even if they're terrible, you have that moment. It isn't just sad emotions, but happiness, too. Whatever emotion is there, it's what you want to capture. Get what's happening in their emotional state. Life isn't always happy. She wants to capture everything. At the same time, you won't capture everything. Sometimes you'll miss the moment and you'll be sad that you didn't get the photograph, but that's ok. You can get the next one.
In order to ensure a steady supply of malt to Steel’s mashing machine, and thus still farther guard against “balling,” Messrs. F. Colyer and Co., of Leman street, have designed the arrangement of a malt feeder, of which we annex an illustration. This feeder is placed between the grist shoot and the mashing machine, and it consists of a casing containing a drum, A, which, has an oscillating motion imparted to it by an eccentric, C, fixed on the central shaft of the mashing machine. On each side of the oscillating drum are flaps, D, the position of which regulate the quantity of malt passing through; the drum, A, as it oscillates, leaving an opening between it and each flap alternately. Interesting that the author notes that where Steel’s masher is used, they only mash once and then sparge. Did the Steel’s masher contribute to the spread of sparging?
But when then-President Clinton awarded the National Medal of Arts in 1997, Rich refused to accept it, citing the administration’s “cynical politics.”
It was my mother's loom, she said.
Promarkers used:
To further complicate matters, there was a board that ran parallel to that stage and my foot slipped up in there, trapped between the board and the stage while my body fell down into the stairwell. My leg bent sideways at the knee. Shattered the bone just under the knee and they had to screw it all back together. Imagine my surprise when I met my orthopedic surgeon ... and he was in a wheelchair. Not exactly the kind of thing meant to install confidence, but other than the Frankenstein scar the staples left he did a fine job.
why astrology is not true ?
· Ability to work with many levels of a multidimensional organization as a change agent.
The daughter was advised to put them in some care home but the social image is the most important thing for her. No one knows what goes on behind the four walls but sending them away in this condition will open many debates, also the property and , money etc will not be passed on to her.
Dickens' affections were often bestowed on the young, the lovely, and virginal. In the early years of his marriage to Catherine Hogarth, a woman described as being rather round and pretty of face (and one who grew yet rounder after sixteen years of marriage and almost continual pregnancy), the writer was often seen out and about, squiring not only his submissive and devoted wife, but also her sister Mary.
Ouch! What a slacker I am! oh well- going to make up for it now! I didn't do a lot in April- but im have been on a roll since the 1st of May! 4 layouts, 2 moms day cards, 2 teach appreciation cards, and 2 mini albums to go with the mom's day cards! WOO HOO! All here in one small spot for you to enjoy :)
The story is a great read when you are looking for something uplifting to carry you through the day. I appreciated that since a lot of the books I was reading there for a while were so depressing I was expecting that the main characters might commit suicide at any minute. I am trying to be more positive and this book certainly helped lightened the mood but without trivializing what some of the characters were going through.
Remember: Positive questions elicit positive answers/results. Negative questions elicit negative answers/results.
René Saldaña, Jr. (Saldaña): Presently, I’m living and working in Lubbock, TX, with my family: my wife, Tina, our boys Lukas, Mikah, and Jakob, and a ton of animals: three cats, a dog, a rabbit, and a tankful of fish.
Good Food Jobs posts listings that food-related companies post from across the nation. This website lists agriculture, business, culinary, design, education, media, nonprofit and production opportunities. So, no matter what your major is or where you are looking to go, there’s a place in food systems for you!
My son Lucas prefers snow skin mooncake, i made this green tea mooncake for him as he also like green tea flavour. Snow skin mooncake is quick and easy to make, definitely more simple than traditional mooncakes.
my life
The check-in process was maddening. Try to imagine the most inefficient way to check a group of 8 adults and 7 children and you still can’t come close to how it actually happened. And in the midst of it all, the power kept going off! It was wild. We were getting closer and closer to the time our flight was to leave. It seriously took hours just for them to check us in and check our baggage. (This wasn’t even waiting in a line! This was simply them actually checking us in!) The sad thing is, is that it was all wrong. They hadn’t checked several of us in for anything beyond our first flight, and had our baggage all mixed around.
“He was well-liked and well-trusted and robbed everybody that he could lay his hands on,” O’Shea said in a telephone interview. “It’s exactly the same sad story.”
And there could I marvel my birthday
Some time ago Emily spent quite a lot of time cutting out images of furniture from a catalogue and sticking them into a scrapbook she was making.Later that day she asked if we could paint her room.My initial reaction was to say no.It seemed no time at all since we had papered and decorated her room and it was still in good shape. I have checked since I started writing this and it was 2003,how time flies! I listened to her explaining about wanting a double bed and could tell it was so important to her.The decorating we had done was quite girly and she was wanting a much more grown up room.
Grace Dunlop
My human nature is to never be satisfied with time. I want more time to rest…or I have too much time and I am bored. My children seemingly grew up before my very eyes. They look forward to the time ahead, and I look back wondering where it went?
Our deepest fear in not that we are inadequate. Our deepest fear is that we are powerful beyond measure.
I wanted to price out eyeshadow primer so we went by Sephora. There were a couple of seemingly unattended 8-9yo girls rabidly applying and washing off as much tester makeup as they could. So of course Emberly wanted some makeup. I told her she had to pick out ONE eyeshadow and ONE lipstick and she could try it before we left.
If you knew the truth you could heal the broken-hearted. No more tears; nope only happiness and joy on my watch. You are trying to say that wouldn’t be cool? To be able to spread joy like the rays of the sun? Everyone you came in contact with could be happy if you were able to fully operate in the truth. If I could do it I would, that is why I am searching for it; that is why I am searching for the truth!
ET
Cataldo said the family strongly objects to the conference using Mokdad’s killing, which they say was a tragedy that had nothing to do with their faith.
Make the frangipane:
Stacey N.
Level 20: Reduces the damage received from the enemies by 15%.
Early in his career, Kahneman was asked by the Israel government to create a high school textbook for teaching kids how to improve their decision-making. For a bunch of bureaucratic reasons, the project was never completed. Sounds like a great idea to me. Thinking Fast and Slow is one of the most interesting, insightful books that I have read in a long time, and I believe most kids would benefit immensely from being exposed to the concepts.
786 ***D-XI/7/1979. “Issues of the Day and the Moral Foundations of the Law.” Phi Alpha Delta Law Fraternity, The College of Law, DePaul University, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-5, above, pp. 185-98 (1992).)
softened and became weak. The egg had been fragile . Its thin outer shell had
Thanks to Karen for being such a wonderful interviewer and writing such lovely words. I was chuffed to say the least.
It's been a loooooong while since I have posted anything...so I thought I'd post a lil' something on my family...
FS: Chris Clemons; Jimmy Wilson; Tyrone Culver
"Don't be silly. You can't see him. He's invisible, just like he was when his spirit rose from the dead."
Surprise...
tired in a good way, but still, TIRED.
Our friends' lives were changed forever as they experienced the ground shake beneath them for what seemed like an eternity, even though it was only 25 seconds. By now hopefully you've seen a few news stories, heard that over 600 people are confirmed dead with thousands more injured, and even more without a place to call home. But that can seem so far away... because, well, it is and
Extreme low power consumption
Yet I like to think that "parody" doesn't necessarily have to be funny, but can be homage or critique as well. My parodies are loose ones - and I've deliberately not mentioned the poet I'm thinking of in each one (they are well known ones, and not necessarily ones I've read that much.) What struck me in writing this series was how "parody" is a little like Mike Yarwood or Rory Bremner's impressions. You don't necessarily know the parodied writer that well, but there has to be enough of "signature" (the equivalent of a facial tic or a particular prop that a Bremner or Yarwood might accentuate) for you to do something "in the style of" that is in itself a new poem. There are quite a number of prize winning poets that I'd find it hard to pull out what their USP was. Even with these, I do wonder whether a poem like "Playing with Guns" is "generic Irish poet" rather than the one I was thinking of.
"Picking you up at the airport."
In a large skillet, heat the olive oil over medium-high heat.
And there you have it. This guy, a friend of a friend, had figured out what I’ve been doing wrong all along. Be more interesting? Meet new people? Write better?
So last week after Art Vs Craft, when I had a ton of stuff I hadn't sold that I had to take pictures of so I could list them in the shop in time for Christmas, my camera bites the dust. Just up and refuses to take any pictures. How frustrating! This weekend I took it into a local camera place and they told me I would have to send it in and it would be around $300 to get it fixed. Damn! Instead I got a used body since my lens still worked. I took it home, played around with it, then hooked it up to my computer to see how the pictures turned out. My computer gave me some BS about installing drivers, which I HAD, and how there weren't any installed, which there WERE. I was nearly in tears--do you know how many things I missed taking pictures of because I didn't have my camera?? Tons! Otis in the cutest vintage shirt, Ingrid in her ballet outfit!
I went to the mall this evening to look for a wide brown belt. While browsing the belt department at Dillards, a young lady approached me and asked me to help her choose accessories to go with her dress for the Kentucky Derby. She explained that she asked me because I reminded her of one of her friends and because my shoes and bag matched (!) Naturally, I was flattered and gave her advice on shoes, a hat, a bag, and a wrap to match the de-gorgeous dress she showed me on her camera. Thank goodness Mike wasn’t with me, because he would have spent the entire time groaning and rolling his eyes. I, however, had a great time helping the girl out. If only I could do that full time…
meds only do so much.
So... this was probably one of the, if not the major draw card for Melbourne Festival this year. Mono playing Holy Ground with a complete orchestra. Yes please! To make things even better my good friend James Wallace a.k.a. Wintercoats got the amazing privilege of opening for them.
Tupper had been hoping the Pred wouldn’t think him too old for such things. With a small bounce, he threw his arms around the tall man’s neck. He returned the embrace, and Tupper squeezed tight, mumbling, “Missed you.”
Ma vai! You're kidding!
I asked Jack what sets Mexican style beer apart from beers that we’re traditionally familiar with here in the U.S. If I may condense his answer into a single word, that word would be “corn.” (You won’t find this on the Wikipedia page for Beer in Mexico.) Corn is a decidedly American addition to the brewing process, making its appearance on the brewing scene in the late 1860s. Back then brewers learned that, although it was more expensive than all-malt Bavarian brewing, using corn or rice produced a lager with an attractive yellow color and favorable characteristics in body and head. The folks at Del Norte revisit this philosophy and succeed in producing beers that satisfy both the eye and the palate.
This post: "High oil prices: Fortunately and unfortunately" by Chris Nelder is a useful crib sheet on what higher oil prices can and may well mean in the near future in the US.
From cityofdearborn.org
"The remarks are even offensive to police.
So, from now on, we are conducting the poop test.
The very students who most need opportunities to connect, either with literature or through writing, are the very ones whose educational experiences are being made narrower and narrower until the whole of what they “know” can be expressed by filling in a bubble.
hope everyone is having a wonderful wednesday!
River that must turn full after I stop dying
I also had a dream where my father was letting me drive his car which I sucked at. This dream's odd because my father would never let anyone drive his car because it's expensive.
Because when I rollover from a sleepless night of indecision and indigestion, tequila ad nauseam, the skankin’ clock flashes it’s red neon limbs, drag-queening a digital disco display of 5:41.
I have also noticed that those who shout others down, be it with anger or mockery, rarely stand up themselves to do the hard work. It’s easy to put on the appropriate garb and join in at a large gathering, or get vocal behind the veil of an internet group, but when a Priest is called upon to teach, minister a service or provide chaplaincy during a life crisis, those loud voices suddenly go quiet.
Above all, Father, cause my wife to enjoy you with ever-exceeding delight so that her heart becomes more and more lost in yours.
Chris and I began celebrating Christmas last weekend. We went to Lepanto to celebrate the holidays with my family. Chris calls it the, "The Triple Crown of Christmas" because we spend one day with just my parents then the others with my grandparents for a grand total of 3 parties. I forgot my big new camera and my old point and shoot camera just broke so I have no pictures (I am so mad).
*SLAP*
car driven by a teenager with a driver's permit. Somebody said if you're a
This particular gun was in Princess Diana's funeral, it has not been used since and probably won't be again because of its significance.
4) It was never impossible to find a plumber, though it was impossible to find a CHEAP PLUMBER - before the european union allowed millions of economic migrants into the UK the trade of a British plumber was well paid with loads of work. Wages have now dropped and jobs are going to dodgy europen workers with dodgy qualifications, who dont pay tax and who undercut British workers wages and conditions.
“I need to fart”
Facebook Fans: 1,600
Grandma goes into the room to say her final goodbye to her beloved grandson and who does she see there standing there looking like he’s having a bad 80′s hair day? Outside while she’s hugging him, the Evil Couple meets Park Ha and they share a moment. Dude, you really think she’s going to remember you? Okay, fine, she probably will since this is a drama but in real life, she won’t so just relax!
A: I received an ARC for review, but I'm also reading it for pleasure. Erik Larson is one of my favorite authors.
In dismissing BAT's Appeal the three judge Appeal bench held that there can be no proprietary rights in a particular colour and there can be no proprietary rights in general in words descriptive of goods.
The packaging was nice and secure as they came in they're own little box:
I do have a photo of my newest favorite in my baby's wardrobe. This floral hooded jumper is by Tea Time, and I am surprised at how much I love the color plumb on her! Something about it really works with her coloring. Thanks Hansen's! I'm so excited it finally fits her :)
You promised me I'd be okay
Read this out loud and clear…Today I want you to get in front of the things that’s holding you back to becoming the best you can be…
So as always, the first weekend of May means the Northern Star Quilt Show in Somers, NY.
The world shakes free from the quiet white blanket
That's it. They are that easy to make...and to eat too!
If you read the constitution of India, it clearly says in the Article 14,
Wol: (on his back rolling in laughter as he comes to grips with his mushy friend) Dude, stop it, you’re killing me!!
So I was sent off in a plane to go fighting, per my force-fed destiny, and upon landing, I ate ALL the bad guys. Apparently eating bad guys is rough on even robot-enhanced teeth though, because I chipped my front teeth which thoroughly pissed me off because the one good thing I liked about the surgery was getting my nice perfect pearly-whites.
2) When I am in my right mind, I find it highly doubtful that there’s a panacea for those seeking to live a good life. Every person, every life comprised of different situations, every single day is different. What is good for my friend may not be good for me–reading science fiction makes him happy, and reading literary fiction makes me happy. Does that mean that one is objectively more good? Doubtful. Likewise, just because a certain way of eating works (or doesn’t work) with someone else’s life doesn’t mean I should immediately adopt it or dismiss it. If well-being is an activity, then surely part of that activity is simply finding what works for you personally.
This Easter was so special for me. Being part of such a reverent Good Friday service really set my mind to fully comprehend what an incredible sacrifice was made for ME. My Pastor wrote three monologues from the point of view of Simon Peter, Mary Magdalene and a Centurion at the crucifixion. I saw myself in each of them. Simon Peter…the times I know my behavior has betrayed my faith. The times I have behaved badly and it would be hard to know my identity is in Christ. The times I have ignored that still small voice in me and felt the eyes of Christ on me. The Centurion…the times I have been a part of something I know to be wrong and wished I could be somewhere else or be someone else. The times I have been afraid to speak out. And Mary…I have definitely had times in my life I walked with my eyes downcast and felt unclean. But I also know the feeling of being cradled in the arms of Christ and the forgiveness and cleansing only He can give. I spent much of the service in tears in the darkened sanctuary. Hearing the sound of the nails being pounded in...and knowing my guilt.
. . . in the second window, significant limitations are placed on such challenges, while preserving the core intent of the old reexamination process: creating an efficient and effective process for challenging the validity of a patent. A PGR petition may be filed throughout the life of the patent in this second window, but only if (i) the continued existence of the challenged patent claim is likely to cause the petitioner significant economic harm, and (ii) the petitioner files the petition within 12 months after receiving notice of infringement. Thus, only a PGR petitioner who has a good deal at stake may bring such a challenge, and may do so only if the patent holder has already, on its own volition, placed the issue in play.
I found a lakehouse on Lake Freeman that I am hoping to get. I've contacted the owners and am waiting to hear back. I'm already daydreaming of the afternoons with the kids playing in this fenced in yard, the mornings where I take my coffee out to the boathouse to sit by the water, the evenings where we play board games or do fun activities, the baking I can do with the kids. I'm already planning out how we would pack the van- we plan to take the dogs- and what shopping would need to happen and if we should take our bikes and...
We all know that breast cancer affects women at a significantly higher number of women than men, but still, cancer is cancer. When the Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Act was passed in 2000, it was designed to cover women, and only women. According to the ACLU, “The federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services have instructed state Medicaid agencies that male breast cancer patients are categorically excluded from coverage for treatment, even if they meet all other qualifying criteria.” That is horrendous. Cancer is cancer, and Medicare/Medicaid should cover all of it. This does beg the question of where the deuce our tax money is going.
Stray Dog – 2
This is the weekend when I finally go and get a Christmas tree. As we support the wholesale slaughter of evergreen trees, I'll be picking up a "live" tree. This is why I'm getting the tree only three weeks before Christmas. It's an attempt to lower the potential of the tree bursting into flame (always a damper for the holiday celebration) and to slow the inevitable dumping of needles onto the carpet in my living room. I'm thinking, however, that I might invest in a nice artificial tree next year as well as an evergreen-scented candle. Not only will I have the smell of a tree, but I'll also have a cozy light of a candle to warm myself by during the cold, dark weeks leading up to the arrival of winter. Plus, then I'll be able to turn the heat up a little bit and not freeze my ass off quite so much. *rubs frostbitten cheeks*
I'm glad I picked up a cookbook from my bookshelf the other day. And even though I've looked through my cookbooks many times, I still enjoy grabbing an armful of cookbooks and plopping on the sofa to re-read them. There's always a new recipe that I missed before... or an old recipe that I meant to make, but never got the chance. New technology has now made recipes available at the click of a button. It's easier... no need to store books. But every so often I miss leafing through cookbooks... there's nothing like having the hard copy in my hands.
Laura Ellen is a fellow Michigan writer I've had the pleasure of meeting thanks to SCBWI. She is a talented and fascinating individual, but she tells her story better than I do, so you can find out more below. But I did want to say her debut novel, BLIND SPOT, sounds incredible and I can't wait to read it. I hope you'll check it out too.
(now closed)
Tel: +33 (0)1 43 48 48 48
H.B.Warner Lost Horizon
Yes, flow is about paying the people who you owe...whose goods and services you used...and feeling GOOD about it. But flow is also about GIVING JUST TO GIVE. Doesn't seem like it would be such a stretch for a former scholarship fundraiser, but it took me aback.
I think it will have to change the purpose of my blogging since it was all about "A Journey through Grief". I don't know what else I could blog about but I'm sure there will be plenty of other things in time. But one thing is for certain my course of direction will have to change. I can no longer be the "grieving wife". What I now know would make my husband my "ex".
Oh, and here is the video I put together! Until later!
Turning to the US, we have an elegant and trenchant article by US Magistrate Judge David Waxse with the title Cooperation – What Is It and Why Do It?, published by the Richmond Journal of Law and Technology (JOLT). Judge Waxse begins with an analysis of the mutual benefits which explain why humans cooperate as a general matter; lawyers, he says, prefer to argue, partly because that is how they are made, partly because they think that their duty of zealous advocacy overrides and conflicts with any duty to cooperate, and partly because they make more money that way.
1 Camille Beckman Sugar Cane Body Polish in Fragrance "Mango Beach" - #3 seller nation wide - its an exfoliate made with sugar cane rather than a salt scrub
He lifts his teeth as if to bite!
“Starts with B”. So smart, so young.
Need to give you all a huge Thank You for joining last week - WOW, you do make it really hard to choose a Top Three, but I managed it, LOL. So without further waffle from me, here are the winners and Top Three:
Using an electric mixer on medium speed, cream together the butter and sugar. Add the egg and beat until pale and smooth.
I was always the one thinking that the photographs of a “weight loss” product was a scam, you know those before and after photos, with your first reaction oh yes that’s some good editing skills that went on there…hehe! Well today I can tell you that my photographs used in this add is my transformation without any editing – that was really my before and it was an exact 12 week journey towards my transformation. That was not the end though and I would say I’m in better shape now than then but still those photographs were taken exactly on the day marking the first and the last day of week 12!
The sanctuary reopening will begin with a PRAYER & PRAISE SERVICE on Friday, February 3 at 7:00 PM.
Prior to getting into an agreement, retailers need to figure out the particular purchase price and rent they will price for your home. Every quantity is commonly prone to negotiation, just like a regular sale would be. But buyers and sellers need to keep in mind that once they indication a contract, the particular purchase price of the home is located in ’till the end of the rental term, between 1 and three years. Even when other real estate costs increase as well as drop in that period, the initial agreed-upon prices are last.
(annoyed pause on my end) "Uh, yeah. Because my first baby DIED."
This month, we here at ODBD are celebrating! Not only do we have the release today, but March 17th is Our Daily Bread Designs fourth anniversary!!! Can you believe it? So we will be celebrating all month long! There will be challenges throughout the month, a special tutorial, a fun game, a look back, and of course, the Big Release of the always anticipated Anniversary Sets on Mar. 17th, and a special blog hop that day! Yes there will be LOTS of opportunities to win fantastic prizes!!! Be sure to check out our usual challenges ( Let Your Light Shine scrapbook challenge posts every other Tues., and Shining the Light Challenge every Sat) and come back here on Mar. 8th for a special post detailing all the events of the anniversary week (Mar 10 - 17).
To play along, just create a paper crafted project using these colors as a starting point and add a direct link to your finished project using the linky tool found at the end of this week's CTD post. As always, if you don’t have exact color matches, something close works just fine. And, if you upload your project to an online gallery, use the keyword CTD190. Before you get started, here’s some inspiration from the talented Color Throwdown team and May’s guestie, Kittie Caracciolo:
The Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation program in India was promoted as “The Last Mile: Eradicating polio in India.” The promotional video displayed numbers showing thousands of cases of polio in India decades ago, with the number of cases dropping to 42 by 2010. But it appears that wild polio virus stats have been traded for polio from vaccines and non-polio acute flaccid paralysis (NPAFP).
so deeply and tenaciously and wildly?
Mayoral candidates in London have refused to share a stage with the BNP candidate – Ken said he was a threat to democracy and elimination of our basic rights.
swill
Rnd 7) Knit 4, knit 2 together around
5. If you feel nervous, don’t worry that’s natural. Everyone gets nervous, some people are better at hiding it.
An opportunity to write with a purpose
Fine mousse. Soft rounded nose. Good acidity. Ligfhtly herbal notes. Good depth and elegantly creamy. Blanquette with its high proportion of Mauzac can sometimes be a little rustic, but not this.
You’ve heard the rumors. You’ve listened to the whispers. You’ve dismissed them as bunk, much like Bigfoot, UFOs, the idea that Michael Bay is capable of making a movie without using slo-mo, or the notion that Aaron Sorkin can end the season of any of his television shows with an episode titled anything besides “What Kind of Day Has It Been.”
Moderator: Ilona Cardinal (University of Alberta)
**For my family, any leftover dough is used to make "Initial" cookies. Ropes are made from the leftover dough. The first letter of each family member's name is shaped and placed on the cookie sheet. Each letter is 2"-3". For some reason these are eaten last, by the individual's choice. Maybe because it will be the last one saved out! :)
The space flows seamlessly into the bedroom where a contemporary painting put together the colour scheme and white bedding with embroidered forest keeps the bedroom crisp while maintaining our modern lodge concept.
Now, let me explain about flashbacks. They aren’t just quick little snippets of memory flashing through my brain. For up to five minutes, I’m taken back to those moments. My boyfriend stops being my boyfriend because in my mind, he’s one of the assholes who raped me. I feel the same crippling fear I felt four years ago. It is completely and utterly terrifying.
Happy Stamping!!
i may buy another one on amazon. just so we have one that doesn't fall apart.
Woohoo! Three repeats in a row, but this time we're back to my favorites: this blue gown and jacket combo worn at the courts in 2008 and 2010 is purely regal. An excellent comeback, after I wasn't so impressed with yesterday's look.
Have you ever had a religious experience at the grocery store?
I remember going to the Texas State Meet in 1986 with my friend Frank Arriola (El Paso Bel Air) who was competing in the 1600. I went to support Frank and also as a Track fan to watch the great Reuben Reina (San Antonio Jay) go for his 3rd straight 3200/1600 Championship. I watched Reina run an 8:58 to beat Eric Henry (McCullough/The Woodlands) and a 4:09 to beat John Holmes (South Houston). I thought it was the most amazing double. I was in awe. So to see German Fernandez double a 4:00/8:34 1600/3200 a couple weeks back just leaves me at a loss for words. He beat an 8:58 by almost 200 meters!!!!! Think about it.
Dad and I sewing when I was about 5....not sure what Dad was making!
(General Najiya shouts. Red lights out and white lights open.)
Gene Tierney starred in the Broadway production as Patricia Stanley, she was to be loaned out to Warner Bros. but was cast in Tobacco Road instead.
This concept was a Row Robin and is the idea of Jen of ReannaLily Designs. I was excited to be invited to join this fun group of gals in this project! Do you know what a Row Robin is? It is a quilt made in, usually, horizontal rows and each row is a different style or type. Many times ladies would pass the quilt along to the next person in the group and add a row. The quilt would continue to be passed around until it arrived back to the original owner- with all sorts of surprises- from fabric, to design, to technique. It is really a neat idea. Think Round Robin, with a twist.
12. Maps of block location and property location
Would Catholics be disagreeing with the speech if we didn’t already live in a world in which Catholics can do what they want? Would non-Catholics say that their “faith informs their politics” if everyone assumed that “faith=mindless fealty to the Pope” as it is sometimes assumed about Catholics?
Jenny J was assigned to us next, and answered question after question about our trip details, from the type of boots we should bring, to which hotels carried shampoo and hair dryers. And then, while we were overseas, she continued to be so patient with my many questions about hotel transfers and diet requirements. Jenny always returned my emails the same day, when possible. I always knew things were under control back at the office, which reflected on our trip within Argentina.
Prepare a mix with pecorino, white bread crumbs, chopped garlic and parsley. Spike the baby goat with this mixture. Peel and slice the potatoes. In a baking pan, place 4 Tbs. oil and arrange the sliced potatoes in the pan. Place the baby goat on top of the potatoes and add more of the mixture. Add salt and pepper, drizzle with remaining olive oil and bake in oven at 450 degrees Fahrenheit for 1 hour.
Wins aren’t always pay days? Success isn’t always public adoration? Appreciate the journey we’re on…? Shinny turds are still turds? Turn up that Rock music? I have no idea… Take from it what you want. I’m sure when Dave Navarro did that interview to promote some TV show, he had no idea that I would find it while researching for a script, and then that it would be referred to in a blog entitled “Polishing an “O” out of Poop.”
This drawing reminds me of my "carbs" drawing (#52), but better. :) I also switched back to the brown paper journal.
I feel secure wearing this. I know it's a strange way of putting it... It's not a comfort scent, it's not meant to be, but there's something very comforting about this.... and I realized it was the Guerlain signature. My father used to wear Guerlain all the time,Vetiver, Habit rouge, Heritage, and there's something about Shalimar Parfum Initial that strongly reminds me of the Guerlain family and how my father smelled. I think it's the bergamot, and it really makes me feel at ease.
Really, though, all of the above is just the tip of the iceberg. There's a ton of good information in this book (including a few points that had me tearing my hair out, as I spent too much time and wasted too much clay taking the long way around figuring them out on my own). I highly recommend this book. Buy it from Kate (she will include a free additional project if you buy it directly from her), buy Sculptural Metal Clay Jewelry: Techniques and Explorations from Amazon - but just buy it.
I feel like I'm giving out alot of personal information online here. But I really feel like it is important for me to do so for two reasons. I don't communicate well with people when it comes to my emotions. I have a really hard time admitting when I need help or when I'm hurting. But yet I can spit it all out when I'm writing. I've always been that way. So I need this all out there. I also know how important blogs like this and online support groups were for me the first time and how important they will be again this time. The people I met online in support groups were one of the main reasons I got through it the first time. I remember "stalking" a handful of blogs written by women dealing with this same thing and it was such a relief to know that someone else in the world understood. I really want to do that for someone else. I suppose I hope I don't just scare them off though. ;)
When I told her the best way of treating them to ensure the infection goes away and they retain their sight, I was so much sure than I ever am. I’m not a caretaker type, I shy away from responsibility whenever I can, I hate that feeling of something or someone depending on you and forgiving you immediately whenever you screw up. There’s no balance, there’s just blatant forgiveness.
“Love me,” he screams.
He comforts us in all our troubles so that we can comfort others. When they are troubled, we will be able to give them the same comfort God has given us. (2 Corinthians 1:4 NLT)
(You don't often credit the Geordie people with wit. Or taste. Or erudition. Or anything except borderline barbarian sensibilities, but on this occasion, you have to say they did well by coining that phrase.)
7) How many stories did you start writing before you found a "winner" and how did you know you'd found a keeper?
Lucky was 14 years old, which is a good, long life for a dog. She was a Jack Russell Terrier who could dig almost her entire body underground in her younger days. My mom and dad really loved her. So did I.
Issues like Hunger, Malnutrition, being treated as untouchable bcoz you belong to particular caste or community, Girl child abuse etc etc...... In fact these problems are far away from the reality of our urban, progressive and fairly self reliant people, who were seen lighting candle at India Gate.
(I always check your posts back to see if you have answered my words!)
cafe sipping a cafe au lait?
The Boathouse,
Carwardine is right - the fish is real. But whether or not it actually does what the stories say it does has been the cause of my headaches this week. The truth is somewhat confused.
She never felt in love with someone
Shichirōji: (smiles)
So recently I have decided that I don’t just want this blog to be about my everyday life, or the food that I cook or the pictures I take. Sure that is all find and dandy but I do have a brain in my head and I have a lot of things that I think about that I would really like to be able to share with the world, why? Because since I find them important or interesting there might be other people out there who do also and what better way to find kindred spirits than to write about everything little thing. So that will be what I am going to start doing, don’t worry I’ll still share my recipes and daily life stories but now there is going to be more to this!
THE ULTIMATE GOOD LUCK is one of my favourite crime novels, so it’s just my luck that it was written by one of America’s literary darlings, Richard Ford. Which means that you’re not really allowed to consider it a crime novel - at least, not in polite society (due to a mis-type, I just realised how close ‘polite society’ is to ‘police society’. Anyhoo …)
7Blessed are the merciful,
The Starter Kit is customizable, which means you get to choose which stamps and inks you want so even if you've been stamping for a while, you won't get duplicate sets. Plus, there is absolutely no further purchase or commitment required! That's right! If you prefer not to have workshops or demonstrations, simply enjoy the great deal and walk away!
Spend a few minutes on the stress test.
ME: Yes, has he left a price for me? It’s been a couple of months now.
Go Packers!
Having not initially noticed my computer’s battery throwing a fuss, I definitely did notice when it started blinking every time I charged it. Now I was getting concerned, and the first doubts of suspicion were sown in my head. Upon Googling this as well, I found out I was either not using my battery enough, or it was dying. After a couple more days of rigorous (hah! – Ed.) testing, I have mostly eliminated the former possibility. Thus, as the seeds of doubt were sown, the seeds of suspicion had sprouted into nice, healthy plants.
Place the smothered kale into a food dehydrator at 130 degrees for 9-10 hours, or until a desired crispiness is reached.
The heart kept beating, nose twitching
5 You prepare a table before me
These Church leaders are desiring this passage to be fulfilled and plan to travel to Mt Zion with that in mind. It is cool to think that prophecies in the Bible over 3000 years old are being fulfilled even today. We have been reading through the minor prophets in our devotions and it is interesting to note how often Cush (Sudan) is mentioned, and to think that this country has been on God’s mind throughout history.
Tomorrow morning the husband and I are loading up the car, strapping our daughter in, and heading out for vacation!
Annabella What inspired you to take up quilting in the first place Jennifer?
Let’s face it, we writers are all over the internet: blogging, tweeting, FaceBooking, starting websites, tearing down old websites, basically doing everything we can to get people’s attention so we can sell one more copy of our books. I can’t tell you how many times I have felt an author’s pain when they say: “Marketing takes so much time, I feel like I don’t have time to write anymore.” Can I get an amen?
Because the friendships would be SO genuine, the best you could ever hope to have. If everyone was less focused on themselves, there would be a lot more real giving.
There are a few American manufacturers clinging to life, But We’re gonna have to pretty much rebuild a manufacturing base from scratch. Our solution will be bold and it will be broad. The Federal government will:
There's still ONE more chance to WIN the ENTIRE MAY RELEASE today, so be sure to participate in our BLOG HOP with the PREMIERE FARMERS and stay tuned TOMORROW to find out who won the prize and also who our MAY GUEST DESIGNER will be! For now...here is your blog hop order:
I am having a Christmas Ornament and Tags class and a Simple But Sweet Christmas card class at Anna Bearden's house on Saturday, December 3rd. The tags and ornaments will be at 10 am and the cards will be at 1:00 pm.
When I joined the company softball team one spring, I realized the only pair of sneakers I owned were the faithful pair I wore in college, before my “metamorphosis to maturity.”
We were all celebrating a couple of weeks ago when our youngest son secured a two year training contract with a firm of solicitors, which he will start in September when he finishes the last year of his University Degree Course in Law. Last year, at the end of the first three years of the course he gained a First Class Honours Degree and just has to finish this year to be able to have the letters LL.B (Hons) after his name, which makes him a Bachelor of Law. We're so proud of him because he started this degree when he was eighteen but dropped out after 12 months, then decided to go back to University at the age of 32 to obtain his Law degree. He has worked extremely hard and suffered financial hardship because they have had to rely on just his partner's income for the past four years. He really couldn't have done it without her support, she has worked all the hours God sends to keep them afloat and will still have to work hard for the next two years whilst he is completing his training with the solicitors, as although he will get paid during his training, it won't be very much. Hopefully in two years time they will both benefit from all their hard work when he has finally become a fully fledged solicitor. MWM and I are looking forward to July when we will go to his graduation ceremony to see him receive his First Class Honours Degree at last.
If I get really carried away I wait for Johnny Letts after a win and get disappointed when he never shows.
17 - Roy Drusky - Another - 2:43
Below are the two projects of the day, the second picture is unfinished:
I realised just now, when posting up my comments on Christopher Logue's death, that I had completely forgotten to flag up my extracts from "Gawain" that appeared at Horizon Review a few months back.
5. Train the kids:
Allow me to explain: Ed had no problem giving us a graveyard filled with cardboard tombstones. Ed had no qualms about spaceships that wobbled about on strings. Ed wouldn't think twice about casting people in his movies that should never have been cast in movies to begin with. If it was in service to his story, then it was all good. For Ed, it was about the act of film-making; yelling "action" and "cut" and directing a script he himself wrote - no matter how ungainly, no matter how ill-conceived.
Lots of fine-sounding rhetoric about unacceptable bonuses, but when it comes to European proposals to tax the financial sector, he plays the national card. NOT TAXING bankers is in our national interest. NOT TAXING nobles is in Louis XVI’s interest. Who benefits? Answer: bankers and nobles, at least in the short run. With Fred Goodwin have we reached a Marie Antoinette moment – a lightning rod for all our hatred of the bankers? Revolutions are a sign that political elites have failed to reform in time.
So happy you could hop along with us today, and your next stop will be at the sweet and very talented Janice's Blog. Should you get lost along the way, there's a complete hop order below.
“Kara…” I couldn’t manage his name, because they rolled me somewhere that needed him to stay outside. That and the awful smell I had grown to avoid by rule, made me realise it was a hospital I had woken in.
members that survived her were in the process of dividing up her
Today’s reading comes from the New American Standard Bible.
* The Rev. Phillip Evans (29), his wife, Suzan (35), and their daughter Rebecca (4).
Obviously, this whole issue goes to the abortion debate which should never have strayed into the ambiguous, infinitely vague, existential question: when does life begin?
Worryingly, the report indicates that the UK intelligence services lack the oversight that would prevent crimes like complicity in torture from recurring in the future. It recommends that:
Michael Clarke, 27, Prince's Bay, N.Y.
Rorys job went tits up a few months ago so we can't get as high a mortgage as we would have last year which is a bummer but my little income has boosted the loan amount we can get together and our budgets not that bad really. Just means we either get a shitty 1 bedroomed flat in the centre or a 2/3 bedroomed house out in the country. I love living in the city centre at the moment but I won't miss the noise at the weekend and I do really like country living.
Here is the first fix:
He prospers!—slags-off, preaches, fanning his tail;
Sarah told us to just wait and see the free clothes we were going to get, and the food whenever we wanted it. We didn’t even have to do our own hair, she said. She just couldn’t believe the free clothes, the free room service, the private jets, and being escorted by cops.
Dear Lord and Father, I praise You and rejoice at Your Word that has made me realize Your eternal plans of success, prosperity, progress and victory for my life. I’m grateful to know that You’ve already ordained me to a life of victory and triumph, in Jesus Christ Name! Amen!
One of my all time favourite shonen anime/manga of all time, Rurouni Kenshin, a story of a wandering swordsmen who is atoning for his past sins in this newly formed Meiji era.
Rabbit is colored with SU! Markers too.
And now I'm going to go out in the garden and do some gardening.. cause that's what good housewives do when they have nothing else to do right? :-P
Individuals with better childhood cognitive function had a lower risk of being on long-term sick leave in adult life, even after a range of health and work factors had been taken into account. Additionally, the effect was similar across all three age groups. Original paper here. Intelligence has been associated with both health and longevity, and a number of theories have been set forth to explain the result, which could be due to better compliance with doctors' orders, better health surveillance, fewer accidents, or maybe even a "fitness factor", in which intelligence is a result of overall better health, i.e. better brain health due to overall better health.
SAT. 10/4 - MARTINI DIARIES featuring JEFF STETSON & friends @ COLOMBO'S ITALIAN STEAK HOUSE IN EAGLE ROCK, 10pm - 1am. 1833 Colorado Blvd. 323-254-9138. Full kitchen & bar. Jeff sez: first set will be Jazz & then evolve into "Acid-Lounge-Jazz-Rock!" 1st & 3rd Saturdays of each month.
Natalie and I are going to see the Backstreet Boys!
Just wait, the garden is going to ROCK this year!
These are Grandmas Cats..sitting on the front step..waiting..waiting for Grandpa to come out carrying the slop pail..or waiting for him to go and milk.
“Hey,” pointed Hank, “I do not want to hear about anyone being with my daughter.”
Making my home my own has been a journey,
It seems that only goes for illegal aliens. That is all they help. Refugees they called them. They told me to walk up the street to a church and they should be able to help me. So I do. They tell me that they have no money. I told the woman I was looking for money, I was looking for a doctor who can give me something so I can't stop going to the bathroom every ten minutes and stinging like crazy when I do. She said they can't help me. I asked do they have names of doctors for illegals? I didn't wait for a response.
“We have seen the greatest response to the awards in recent years, with the industry's diversity reflected in the wide range of nominees,” commented Eagle Awards chair Cassandra Conroy.
And -- since Mr TR is back to work today after a stint working from home -- I have my office to myself again! I must admit, it's much better for concentrational (not a word! I know!) purposes.
A very dear friend of mine was denied a promotion because she was told that she did not dress for her next job. I asked her to explain and she shared that because she came to work in jeans, sandals and many times too casual, she was perceived as not caring about her job or her work. Here are some Smart Solutions that will get you noticed and considered for your next job.
The technology behind the world-class infrastructure in Makati City is provided APC by Schneider Electric. A significant portion of IP-Converge’s data center environment is the product of a turnkey project that APC conceptualized, designed and installed which include – data center solution and equipment, from racks, to power and cooling.
By 2010, the Grain-SA Cooperative only had about 1,000 grain-producing farmers left in the entire country. They still produce an impressive amount of food under the most dangerous farming conditions in the world - but not nearly enough to feed the entire South African population. The country now needs to import grain-products in massive quantities from off-continent. The CIA observations from space have also recorded that less than 0,5% (one-half of a percent) of the entire South African land-surface is still being used for irrigated agricultural-production.
Ethics Committee Chairman Mark Weprin (D-Queens) refused to say if the report should be made public.
b. If a fifth of the members of the People’s Assembly object to a legislative decree, on the grounds of its unconstitutionality within 15 days of it is being presented to the Assembly, the Court shall rule on it within 15 days of lodging the objection at the Court;
Not that I was every really fantastic, you know like blogs that make you think "OMG I could've have written that, and then everyone would think that I was a genius instead of that assdouche.", but lately it's been especially shit-tastic.
I have to be honest and say that I’m not the biggest sports fan in the world: I like tennis, but that’s about it, and I’d rather forget the films that have been made about it. But all of the sports movies I’ve suggested here are worth seeing, for a number of different reasons – and the only physical exercise you’ll have while watching them is adjusting the volume control!
—Joseph Goebbels, 1932 pamphlet
The value of the debt paper sales is widely ranging from $10 million issued by Sarana Bina to $2 billion for sale by PLN. Yet in overall, the raised fund from the corporate actions is expected a minimum of $2.67 billion or 22.46 trillion rupiah. That amount may contribute to an increase by 35 percent by the end of this year at a value of 49.47 trillion rupiah ($5.81 billion) compared to 2010.
“I’m a huge fan of her accomplishments and think she’s a huge role model in some ways, but I think she’s overly critical of women because she’s almost implying that they don’t have the juice, the chutzpah, to go for it,” said Sylvia Ann Hewlett, president of the Center for Talent Innovation, a research organization on work-life policy, and director of the Gender and Policy Program at Columbia University.
Where, as it once were wont, to the sock drawer I'd stumble
I don't know many details about the origin of the flapper craze, but there was previous use of the word to the 20s, and there were French and English flappers before the fad hit in America. This magazine looked to ride the wave of the popularity of this new kind of girl and was apparently for a short time successful. The back cover boasts of the demand for the first issue:
at a lost today, m'darlings...people are fine, but i am totally wiped out...i've stumbled around the blogosphere and left a few comments, but i'm tired...wiped out....wrung out....and what's even worse
So the Daughter took dad to Court, proved he made, and repeated, the promise, proved that she relied upon it to her own detriment ( by spending heaps of money on the house) and the Court agreed.
“Usually, every institution is designed to resist change. Status quo is the norm,” says Naveed Chaudhry, director of the Peel Multicultural Council, a non-profit group that receives United Way and government funding.
I don't get the chance to bake with blueberries, or any berries for that matter, very often. They somehow disappear almost as quick as I can buy them. And for some reason, the empty containers magically appear under my dining room table.... I somehow managed to keep enough around long enough to make this delicious Buttermilk Blueberry Breakfast Cake. It's moist, tender and just plain tasty.
told
So: Bingo! We now have it. We know what image of everlasting fire Jesus had in mind. He had in mind the continuously burning fire of Jerusalem's garbage incinerator. And, needless to say, the bodies thrown into Gehenna don't feel anything. They have simply died and been disposed of in an ignominious way. So both goats and the Devil are simply going to die -- but die in disgrace.
It was an absolute shock to receive it, but incredibly meaningful as all the hard work I’d put in at training paid off not just in a premiership but also in the recognition from the coach; someone I greatly respected. Mr Roach recognised my efforts and perseverance at training each week and believed it deserved reward. I learnt that day the value of perseverance and what it could do in my life.
The new implementation date is April 30, 2012, which will allow time to resolve legal challenges.
Hope you enjoyed your peek today!
‘Well, that’s not a day off then is it?’
Steel City is back on top this season after fixing the one big problem they had. Ben Roethlisberger’s sore ass from being sacked millions of times. They got two great offensive line prospects early in the draft and will be much improved all around.
When the brine has boiled, pour half into each jar. Screw on the lids and refrigerate for at least 2 days before sampling.
Today, we read "Inch by Inch" by Leo Lionni. This is a cute story about an inchworm who measures various birds...until he inches out of sight! After reading, we discussed how we could use "inchworms" to measure items around our desks (how to start at the edge and line up cubes with no gaps, etc). Since I don't have these adorable inchworm manipulatives, we just used linking cubes and pretended they were inchworms. I called out various items for the inchworms to measure and the kids worked with their partners to estimate and measure each object. Here is a copy of my recording sheet.
W and I had a good chat. It felt better. I tried to feel what I was really feeling and felt that it was worth the sacrifice of being shit scared of flying just to be there when F gets married. She is just booking tickets now. I continue to shit myself. If I don’t have a brain aneurism or stomach ulcer already, I think I will have by the time exams are finished and its time for the wedding.
We are all smiles
options I fished out my
3. Wall hangings – Most rentals do not allow paint on the walls. Unique wall hangings can add the expression you are looking for without damaging the walls. Large panels with fabric in your color of choice will work for any wall.
Any chair or sofa or couch with a curved back with a center "hump" might be considered a camelback.
At the time Russell knew nothing about spirituality, and it was several years before he fully understood the shift he experienced. Eventually he became a spiritual teacher, and has held twice weekly talks in Manchester, England for the past 50 years. (In fact, it’s quite common for people who experience these ‘suffering-induced transformational experiences’ – as I have called them – to become spiritual teachers. Krishnamurti, Eckhart Tolle, Byron Katie and many others – including some non-duality teachers – went through periods of intense turmoil before awakening.)
I walk ahead and ahead
Time for the most exciting part of our class: final projects. This is the time in the class where we put all we’ve learned to test. We need to pair a wine to a dish and be able to bring out certain elements in the wine.
Hot-cross buns! Hot-cross buns!
Many times we ask Why, God-Why? We struggle for answers to understand the situation and we turn to God’s word to try to find answers to our own questions. Reading the scriptures, we find numerous occasions where men such as David and Job endured loss of loved ones and endured tragic situations and we can see the hand of God working even in the midst of death. Anyone has endured heartache, tragedy and grief has asked questions like these. The problem is that many times they are not always answerable with perfect clarity or reason. Many things are secrets in the mind of God and therefore mysteries to us.
“Oh, you shall eat me? I have made you tiger, and you want to eat me?”
All the stuff's got bum and bummer,
And so on, for about 15 minutes.
Pot of Gold: Chopped cheese stick
Queen Bee……
Then there was: "The Chuckburger's got another one for me, D-Doggie-Dougmeister. We got an overweight cop and his girlfriend dealing with the problems of life."
Household Members:
Julys challenge is something called Liberated Checkerboard. Let me start by saying that I didn't feel at all liberated! But, they look pretty good for a funky type block. It was a real challenge for me, as I really prefer intricate piecing, but I think that whoever wins all the blocks will have a beautiful, and unique quilt.
in large gulps. Its narratives “nest” within a framing device such as one finds in story cycles such as The Arabian Nights or the Decameron, beginning guilelessly and timorously with the young Adrien’s first leave-taking from home, then plunging one into tales of high drama and exoticism combined with a gripping realism. Adrien serves as the conduit for these tales, gathering them from the
Katie from the Make Life Better Foundation called me today and said I would have a weekly coach and some of their products to start with . . . so tomorrow I will start Week 1 Day 1 of my quest to Make My Life Better by my high school reunion . . . please join me on the journey . . . I am going to need your help . . . Kim Power Stilson Go class of 1982!!!!
The treadmill, unfortunately, had to stay in this room (It was assembled in here, we can’t take it out unless it is in pieces!). The recliner also now has a dark brown slip cover that is currently in the washer.
For, howe'er we boast and strive,
- Write a story/poem in 1000 words or less, inspired by the image prompt, and post it in the dashboard available to you, once you’ve signed in.
Accessories: Petite Oval Die Cut, Mesh Embossing Folder, Red Circle Glitter Tape, Red Lace, Red Geo Shapes Sparklers and Dimensionals
Turn off the TV while you’re cleaning and organizing, and let your answering machine field your calls.
“He taking you out to dinner at 3 a.m.?”
Combine the cinnamon and the 3 Tbsp of granulated white sugar together in a shallow bowl. Put aside.
Successful School Visits with Author Catherine Stier
Doodlebug Designs glitter
Row 2- ch1, do not turn, (sc in 8sc, 2sc in next)around, sc in last 2, join to 1st sc. (62)
Behold the brilliance of ksufans.com video artist chum, who was previously the subject of a BearBacker Voices Summer Lecture Series Interview. His complete body of work can be found here. Recently, chum agreed to create a video for these here BearMeats; he did not disappoint. He has turned Baylor, Waco and BearMeat into a beautiful work of art. When I first saw this I removed my boots, because I knew I was standing in the presence of God. After you watch this, you may think that our blog has nothing more to say because of the sheer completeness of this video. It is the most BearMeat creation we have ever witnessed and the Editorial Board had nothing to do with it. Basically, we have been out-BearMeated. Wow. May God have mercy on our souls. It's been a fun run. Pro Ecclesia, Pro Texana! Sic 'em, Bears!
changes, untill further notice..
They and all that they deliver are, in other words, simply bogus.
Nigel presents proven principles guaranteed to inform, educate, motivate and inspire you toward doing your best. You’ll learn how to create or refine your life philosophy….how to utilise your past experiences for future success…. the one thing that can eliminate your opportunities….the simplest path toward achieving success….the most misunderstood aspect of happiness, and how to correct it….and improving the success skills that are shared by about 3% of the world’s population.
Catholicism is not based solely on the Bible. It is based on the revelations of Jesus Christ and the Holy Spirit, on the teachings of the apostles, and on the continuing guidance of the Holy Spirit, who is the constant advocate of the Church and the arbiter of all divine truth, along with Jesus Christ, who is the head of the Catholic Church, and who remains at the very center of all Catholic worship.
*As of this writing there are problems with the tracks from Cuzco due to floods so people have to take a bus to the town Ollantaytambo or Poroy (depends on which rail company) and catch a train from there to Aguas Calientes. They are trying to fix it before high season starts in June 2011.
I: And you gigged with all the big names of the day?
Contrarily to the popular believe that the game of poker began in the 19th century in the US the roots of the game go much further in history and originate from the 10th century AD in China during the emperor Mu-Tsung ruling. Although at the time it was played with dominos, not cards, the principles, rules and strategies of the game were very similar to the modern day poker. It is believed that the emperor himself enjoyed playing this domino game with his wife and the court officials. This was the start of the poker history.
So you’re not so far away
That’s the good news. The bad news? I packed on about fifteen pounds of miserychunk. I’m a chubby bunny, ladies and gents. Just when I thought I’d seen the last of my size 8 jeans, suddenly they’re the only things that fit.
Come Late, Leave Early, just means start a scene when it is interesting (because oftentimes leadup can be reduced to just a lot of quacking), and end at an interesting point (because sometimes drama fizzles if you keep going on and on after the point…)
We actually have three brand new books about Juliette Gordon Low, the founder of the Girl Scouts. Here Come the Girl Scouts! is aimed at young elementary school students, while Juliette Gordon Low: The Remarkable Founder of the Girl Scouts is for adult readers (must read that book this year). The First Girl Scout is ideal for upper elementary and middle school readers. Ginger Wadsworth, a former Girl Scout, is obviously very admiring of Low, but this is a balanced account of this unique woman's life. Due to her hearing loss, Low had to overcome quite a few obstacles in order to achieve her greatness (the pictures of the hearing aids/trumpets that she would have used are extraordinary). Her husband's infidelity is remarked upon, but not sensationalized. Well worth the read for current and former Girl Scouts.
YOU will also be responsible for the results of that wait and see plan. I'd like to point out Katrina as a history lesson for those who wait and ignore warnings of trouble ahead.
On to Mr. Lao, have you seen this video on youtube?
For this AMAZING product can only be bought here.
small stones, day seventeen:
MISS ROCKLAHOMA 2012 CONTEST GETS UNDERWAY MARCH 15
Strewn with arrows memory hastens on
As I was waking up this morning, thinking about how today would be yet another day that I would probably not be dressing up aside from sweat pants and a tank top for belly dancing lessons tonight, I realized that if I were really, genuinely honest about whether or not I dress up for myself and myself alone, I'd be dressing up every day regardless of whether or not I was going to leave the house. I realized that my mindset when it comes to dressing well hinges on whether or not anyone else besides me is going to see me that day. If it's just me, and I stay indoors, then I wear pajamas.
Doug said he really liked the wry, urbane narrative voice of Nathan who, while purporting to be curmudgeonly, is in fact touchingly humane and generous. He did, however, feel that the second half of the book was less satisfying with its plot twists, or rather its sudden changes of plot - one story thread being dropped for another - and that here it rather fell apart. Trevor and Ann agreed with him on this latter point, and Trevor said he thought the ending fizzled out.
Chopped Green Onions (for Garnish)
Ever since then I have officially been self-conscious of how I pronounce ricotta. I’ve actually come to the point where I just call it “the cheese” and then hold up the container of it. How could my Italian family have potentially steered me wrong in my pronunciation of this cheese? For years I had been eating spaghetti and rig-coat-uh, but now I find it was actually spaghetti and rih-kah-tah! Italian blasphemy.
My dad doesn’t need to sip from the Fountain of Youth. He’s drunk from it already.
Moon Knight #12
Last summer we BARELY got hot weather (sniff sniff). Meanwhile, the boys asked EVERY SINGLE day starting in May if they could bring out the Slip 'n Slide. Well, it finally got hot enough around the middle of August to bust it out and I took some pictures! I just love how it looks like Ryan is sliding into the "waves" I die cut!! That piece is the left over piece from the border in the Nautical Frame and Accents set.
Cholesterol is a waxy substance found in the lipids in our body. They are important as they form cell membranes, certain hormones, and are required in other functions of the body. However, when the cholesterol exceeds recommended levels, it becomes a medical condition referred to as hyperchloresterolemia, which triggers cardiovascular diseases.
Let’s just say their attention is a bit . . . divided! Nonetheless, I love them!!
Two little words with such BIG meaning! Not CANCER! Cirrhosis – yes; Portal hypertension – yes; Enlarged spleen - yes; Cancer – NO!
so the impetus and legitimacy for muted moderation wasn’t feint. It made sense. But as usual, I couldn’t leave well enough alone. Three-two roll with open patch pockets and peak lapels…you know…my ADG standard house model? Of course not. But the idea of simply doing a standard Mad Men era three button sack coat which would have exemplified madras in its heyday didn’t trip my trigger. I just had to add something
Now, the PS22 chorus is singing Somewhere Over The Rainbow. I much prefer this
I plop my little ipad, its attached keyboard making it look like a miniature laptop, on top of my son's open planner.
Buddy Bear is sporting a new outfit! He is spending the week in full Palace Guards uniform. Buddy Bear had an outing last week and went to the Dr's with Little "E"! I do like how he has become a real loved character in my setting!
Another dwarf had fallen before the group could slay the rotting bulette, seized within the animated land-shark’s jaws beyond Brother Vang’s means of recovery; the cadavers proved resilient, but nevertheless were swiftly dispatched–and seeing the strength of the defenders had not yet faltered, the remaining vampire spawn withdrew from the field into the fog once more while delivering mocking shouts to the adventurers and dwarves below. As Anselme’s tornado finally began to dwindle far afield, the party gathered together at the center of the hilltop to catch their breaths and begin tending to the wounded once more–the second wave seemingly concluded.
Another guest blog by Sarah Ward … thanks Sarah.
Winter is here and I feel not the cold
Students: it’s possible that Mrs. Sparhawk took grades on the D.O.L. (grammar assignment) today. Please ask her if she did. If so, it’s now possible to download a D.O.L. makeup sheet right here on Clipboards. Just click on the “Assignments” button at the top and download one of the D.O.L. makeup assignments. (Or you can just get one from the makeup work center at school.)
Add the yogurt and 1/2 cup of water. Mix well. Cover the pan and cook until the eggplant has softened, about 10-15 minutes. If it takes longer and the sauce evaporates, add more water as needed.
1. The Mexican War resulted in all of the following EXCEPT:
Josephus of the Destruction of Jerusalem by the Romans in
Every film I saw last year that wasn't a new release, I saw at the PFA. I'm listing the films in reverse chronological order, starting from the most recent screening and working my way backward.
﻿ Challenge
Tune in for more.
How do thy stories, alive underneath my fingers
I tried to take some learning style quizzes online to confirm this, but the results aren’t all that accurate. Mostly because I’m also an introvert with an attention span. I guess most kinesthetic learners can’t hold still, aren’t able to pay attention, and like a lot of group work. And they prefer to mulitask, listen to music while they learn, or otherwise pull their brain in another direction. The last totally describes me, but the other factors really don’t. But I know I’m a kinesthetic learner. And I guess it makes sense–I don’t think I act out (maybe I did when I was younger?) but I would hate to be chained to a desk all day. I like sports and being active. My best memories of school were when we got to go outside to read or of doing creative projects. And though I have always talked too much, I never have liked group work. When it comes to my grades–I want to be in control of them, not dependent on other people–especially in college! Blending 2 busy schedules? Nearly impossible.
None to offer support
With a pot with boiling water, pour in the soaked
cht=bvs
Until recently the lese majeste law was rarely invoked in Thailand – but the number of cases has risen sharply during the political turmoil of the past three years.
If you follow me on Twitter you'll know she's one of those people who is absolutely hilarious without really realising it.
And he phoned the special prosecutor. His own self. Without his lawyers on the line.
Make the left side of this image return. Then I’ll listen.
This will be a great day for families, people with disabilities, those who support them, those in Human Resources, those new to the field looking for direction, and those responsible for supporting folks with disabilities to be included and interdependent.
12/14/09
So here I am.
Mix everything together in a bowl.
Now doesn't that sound like an amazing class! And if you have not been to one of Gurmukh's classes before you will be amazed when out of this tiny, quiet, BEAUTIFUL woman, comes the loud sound of chanting that will stir your soul and it just may... make you weep! (I did!)
As with many writers, I can happily write until the cows come home but when it comes to marketing my work online, I feel like I’m in alien territory. In other words, what I know about the internet could be summed up on a bottle top. I annoy everyone with my questions. Even my normally placid daughter turns into a troll when I approach her with my laptop. Finally she exploded ‘If you want to be famous you’d better learn to market yourself. Now sit down and find people to tell about your book.’
12 ounces beer, IPA or Pale Ale preferably
to enjoy my suffering
“Asked to explain the Government’s position on a military strike by the US or Israel on Iranian nuclear facilities, the Government expressed neither support nor opposition.
One of the questions most often asked in interviews is, "How did you start out in comedy?" (Of course, I'm sure a fair few people want to ask, "are you ever planning to start out in comedy?" but that rarely comes up in interviews).
Its a quirk of the league that this second tier game was in fact played by two Buckinghamshire sides! Mind you Long Crendon is only just over the border, around a mile or so, as you leave Thame.
Journalists, including press photographers, are professionals tasked with bearing witness to matters of public interest and reporting them ethically. This function is especially crucial when there are contentious subjects such as yesterday’s protest, and information from as many sources as possible is needed to reveal the larger picture. Like the police, journalists have a public duty to perform and they should be afforded protection towards this end. Unless journalists are obstructing police work, they should be left alone to do their job. And certainly, no journalist in a nation that prides itself as a democracy should ever be arrested for doing their job.
So you can see how effectively this complementary therapy of healing works.
So as you probably know, on Monday 23rd April lots of people all over the place are giving away books that were sent to them by the lovely people at World Book Night in exchange for their brilliant, original ideas on how to get people reading said books.
The reality, as far as I can see, has been rather different.
Shoes: Sperry
The third issue is that Lightning Source, which has done a good job on the print-on-demand paperback of The Boy With Hawk-like Eyes, does not supply to Peters Bookselling Services. Peters supplies the libraries, Norfolk among them. My local library, Norfolk & Norwich Millennium Library, is the most used library in the UK with over one million visitors a year. A decent number of readers borrow the Sprite books, but how is the library to get hold of my sixth title? Library ordering systems are cumbersome beasts. I have asked Lightning Source if they will consider supplying to Peters, but they say no. How am I to get my title
The thing is, I always know what decision I really want to make, but I just don’t like disappointing people. And I’m one of those people that always assumes they make the wrong decision. I suppose it’s one of those “the grass is greener on the other side” kind of deals.
Chad pleaded with me to leave the body, “It isn’t safe for you here!” but I wasn’t going back to the basement. “If only I could find the nose I might be able to sneeze my way out of there.” We split up. I went to look for some pepper while Chad hide from ‘them’. I knocked on the door of everyone on the top floor looking for some pepper when I finally found apartment A6, here is were my friends had been hiding. Unfortunately ‘they’ had found them first and were holding them hostage looking for me. Now that ‘they’ had me ‘they’ knew I would lead them to Chad. So the search started once again. ‘They’ made me search every inch of every apartment on the top floor. We came to apartment A10 were an old man lived, he couldn’t hear or see and was on oxygen. He spent his days sitting all alone in his chair. I started looking through his closet sad that I would never see Chad again. Suddenly a hand reached out of a suitcase and grabbed mine. Startled I gasped, but the hand squeezed mine and I knew it was Chad. Careful not to let ‘them’ know he was there I finished my search and moved onto the next apartment leading ‘them’ away from Chad. This gave him time to make a mad dash for the roof. He ran out of the apartment and down the halls, flew up the stairs and onto the roof. And there it was. A message his Dad had left him.
All men’s tungsten wedding bands and tungsten rings from Tungsten World come with their industry-best guarantee and warranty, and extensive customer service from the leaders in tungsten jewelry. Not to mention any ring can be personalized with your own custom laser engraved message. And they’ll even exchange engraved rings. Have a look at some of their most popular tungsten wedding bands for men below:
For those of us inclined to pray, we’re already doing it. It’s preaching to the choir. The designation of a day that is set aside for prayer is unnecessary for people who pray and exclusionary to those who don’t.
Two months later, the candy bag has not left my desk drawer, but much of the candy has. I have wee M&Ms or chalky Crunch Bars daily. It’s crappy chocolate, but I get my fix. Sometimes, I offer candy to my boss, but most days, I furtively eat it alone. On Friday, I was overjoyed to find a desiccated Baby Ruth bar among the other candy.
So, despite the title of this post, we did not soak up the sun. At least in some of the pictures. But we tried to. See, I have this great knack for picking the crappiest times to go to the park. Like the one overcast, chilly day in a week full of days in the low 70s with sun. Or at 1:00 on a day in the middle of July…and then I realize on the walk across the street that it is really hot and this was a bad idea. Oh well, if I start going more, then I’m bound to eventually hit a good day. And that has been my goal lately, to hit the park more often. This current Hurricane Gulfport we’re having here is thwarting me, and during the base shutdown no less when I have all kinds of time to kill….by going to the park!
161,000: Private Sector Jobs Lost Since Obama Took Office. (Bureau of Labor Statistics, Accessed 4/10/12)
For the majority of its running times, I couldn’t stop thinking: “what is the point of Larry Crowne“? How do our characters develop? Did ‘Cedric the Entertainer’ actually choose that ridiculous name (ahem, The Rock)? Do I care what happens (no; I would rather think about The Rock)? Is there such thing as a class in “The Art of Informal Remarks”, and is Tom Hanks actually caught in a love triangle with a 20-year-old student and her leather-wearing scooter-gang boyfriend?
your inner peace’s worthy soul
How can I tell what's expected of me?
1/2 cup butter -1 stick
The hit threw him high in the air, made him tumble like an acrobat, like a bag of old clothes.
Mr Edwards argued not unreasonably that the proposal would lead to equality with Scotland and Northern Ireland and that it would mean that we would be better placed to fight fuel poverty with responsibility for our own resources. This entirely reasonable proposal was voted down by Labour MPs, who were more than happy to team up with Conservatives MPs to stop their own party in Wales taking these powers. The proposal was defeated by 239 votes to 44 after Labour and Conservative MPs teamed up against the Bill.
For those who are now totally creeped out, let me toss you a life line. These same guys you have in The Friend Zone, these guys who I assure you would be perfectly fine with being more than friends… these guys are also perfectly fine with staying in the FZ and just being friends. They aren’t biding their time, putting in the niceness points with the expectation of eventually getting sex out of you (unless they’re alphas masquerading as betas). If the attraction isn’t there, if you can’t see yourself being intimate with them, they’re cool with that. They can be your friend, your confidant; they can be happy for your successes and thrilled for you when you find romance. They can be all that without having ulterior motives, believe it or not.
Quick Summer Fruit Salad
Unfortunetly the common PR crap spewed from any company about releasing products when they are ready or products that the people want when the people want them, is really a load of crap.
Fuck I hate earthquakes. My house is already complete chaos, since we're getting ready to move, but my nerves have been shot and since I was up with a migraine I did not need an earthquake on top of it. Funny, now that the earthquake's over, my migraine has improved slightly...
I'm already planning my next trip.
Farm Kid #2: I can’t wait for all the fresh organic fruits and vegetables this summer.
In addition to hosting an inspiring event like this, Metro for girls, along with its brother site Midtown Center for Boys, is celebrating 12 consecutive years of 100 percent graduation and college enrollment. Midtown Educational Foundation helps close the achievement gap for Chicago’s urban youth by providing one-on-one tutoring, high school prep, and college counseling.
Irv's much appreciated candor should give him something to talk about with "clean and green" partner Jerry Finn at tomorrow's NA beautification day.
I have read a lot of blogs that talk about stockpiling, I think this is a great idea, but how to do so when you are very limited on space.
I read some more of my camera manual and learned a bit, putting some of it to practice.
Select left alignment for the text field.
Me: Okay
We walked for about two and a half hours, so it was a good job we had the Karelian pies first. There was also a small amount of bribery halfway round with chocolate Easter rabbits which we'll gloss over.
Sure it rained crumbs in a pretty sweet arc pattern.
'A female character.'
Neil Oelofse
Have you ever picked a flower and looked at its stem?
I want to finish off with this quote/saying I found on line (the author is unknown) but this is currently one of my fav quotes, so true!
At the end of the day BPD is shit and any situation will always be a no-win situation for both parties in some respect. All you can do is do your best not to inflame the situation with knowingly wrong responses – and yes some people once they are aware of wrong responses will then deliberately use these to cause hurt and pain if they have lost all love for the BP or do not respect them, parents are often the worst for this as they feel to ‘blame’ for the child’s condition and want to shift blame back to the BP.
83. Impulse Ellen Hopkins
(Yes, I'm feeling a little snippy)
Look at that lightbulb with the rose in it. I'm freaking out about that. Haleigh always takes such beautiful pictures that make me want to move to Paris and stand out on a balcony with sparklers and
(Piper’s note: Thank you, Holmes, for giving me an excuse to use this fine image of British naval superiority in the 1800s.)
I have children who are growing!
Ekaterina: Thank you guys for linking and mentioning my article. And yes, same experience with books about Russia by Westerners being lauded and preferred over Russian narratives. Russia does have a well-developed SF/F tradition, and it creates an interesting situation: when something DOES get translated into English (not too frequently, I may add), they are often chastised for not being rooted in their own culture enough — which is, not being exotic enough. Heck, I read reviews of my work when readers expressed disappointment that I missed a chance to teach Western audience about my culture. Because apparently it is my job to make Russia-based narratives as surface-alien as possible (inside, of course, they should speak to Western sensibility). Also, when Western writers choose Russia as their setting, they more often than not are unfamiliar with the existing Russian-language literature — that is, they write into the tradition they are not familiar with. They are writing into American/Western tradition, which presents its own narratives of Russia, and THIS is what feels authentic (I hate that word too) to the Western reader.
1) Jessica Simpson naming her baby GIRL Maxwell Drew Johnson. I know celebs…and people in general actually…are trying to get creative with names because that’s the cool thing to do. Or maybe i’m just jealous because I wasn’t named after a fruit, planet, article of clothing, or a guy. But come on. Don’t torture your children in the name of “creativity”.
In a swap with My lovely friend Louise. She has had me doubled up laughing with her e-mails. Her son wondered how I made them so there you go little J. Has the choccie all gone yet? Watch out though British chocolate will give you super powers!!!!!!
Thank You for providing the means for my salvation. Thank You, Jesus, for dying on the cross for my sins so that I can be saved. Thank You for forgiving me of my sins. Please give me the courage to be a witness for You here on earth. I pray this in Jesus’ name. Amen.
The hexagram of Israel has the same connotation. There is one triangle over another and sometimes interwoven, one black, one white. This is the same symbolism displayed in the goddess holding one arm up and one arm down. This is the symbol used by the ancient alchemists to denote dark and light forces. The hexagram can also be found on the floor of Muslim mosques. The Hindus worship a supreme goddess known as Kali. To this day there are human sacrifices to Kali in hopes of gaining earthly wealth. Kali is worshipped on the cremation grounds and is a goddess of destruction. I’d call that a “Cremation of Care”.
Did I also mention this is our 200th blog post? Wow, as slow as I’ve become at blogging, I thought I’d never make it to this point. Never say never! In honor of the 200th post we’re preparing for maybe a little somethin’ special in the near future.
I will remember watching my mum play on the beach with Jack and Phoebe while they ran in and out of the waves, screaming with laughter. On the first day, they went in wearing their undies. That is, until Phoebe took hers off....and then stripped off her singlet, so that she was doing a magnificent nudie run on Lorne front beach. Jack wore Superman undies. A memory to treasure, for sure.
More help...From: Bette Holtman
David being David, instead of taking control and promoting himself then altruistically passed over complete control of the rest of the evening to Richard McDermott
The card used for the back of the stamped giraffe image is Bazzil Basics in a weathered wood colour, covered with magenta, orange and turquoise shade PanPastels. I just love the texture it has created. Stamps are from TH Papillon and Katzelkraft Cirque 01. The main images stamped in timber brown Stazon first then masked off to stamp the background with iced spruce DI. Sealed with Daler Rowney fixative and then embossed all over with clear embossing powder.
—Duffy and the Devil, retold by Harve Zemach and illustrated by Margot Zemach; won the Caldecott medal in 1974—in this Irish folktale, lazy Duffy sells her soul to the devil in return for a gift of work without any effort, but she soon finds a way to win it back and keep all that she's gained, besides. (Sounds bad, but it's really very funny!)
The Condomerie doesn’t only sell novelty condoms but also custom-fit ones. Someone will actually measure your erect penis and tell you your size, because men wearing ill-fitting condoms is as prevalent a problem as women wearing ill-fitting bras. (Except one could end up in a lifelong commitment and the other just makes your back ache for a bit.)
Though the Garifuna musical tradition dates back centuries and the roots of “punta rock” can be traced to before Palacio’s fame (Pen Cayetano pioneered the genre), Palacio’s passing left the Garifuna people without a musical emissary. The figurative torch had not been passed. While the Garifuna music scene is vibrant in Central America and throughout the diaspora, it was not until Aurelio’s 2011 release, Laru Beya, that a Garifuna musician picked up where Palacio had left off on the international scene.
Step 2: The glorious custard-pudding in the making
knowing that thou hast thy seat
· Ensuring proper rest for skilled and technical staff including the running crew.
WARNING: YOU ARE SUPERUSER !!
With a gentle finger, he brushed a hair from the corner of her eye, “I remember being drugged up and people talking to me. I swear I was listening to them in color and not words. It wasn’t until my buddies reminded me of what they said that I understood. So I don’t know how much of what I'm saying to you is sinking in but I gotta ask that you don’t go too far away, okay? I don't know what I’ll do if you decide it’s time to give up. So maybe if you got angry at me? Mad that it’s taken me forever to get to this place. A place where, right now, it feels like my life hangs in the balance as much as yours does. I’ll even take a few hits with a bat if that’ll help ... three might be my limit.” Stooping down, he kissed her forehead and whispered, “Don’t leave me, Meg. You’re the only person in the world who doesn’t make my name sound like an insult. I should have known right from the start that you were mine. I guess you were right, you got the brains. I’ll even let you rub it in ... some more.” Mindful of the oxygen tubing taped to her cheek, DJ kissed her skin. Touching his forehead to hers, he whispered in Meg's ear, “I love you.”
Answer: No thanks. But if they tickle your (ulp!) fancy, head down to Alaska Mill, Feed, and Garden Center. They have an unrivaled assortment. Hopefully my neighbors aren’t reading this. If they are, I say, “I am already dealing with your badly behaved dogs, don’t you dare add whirligigs to the mix!”
- Serial number
Why is it that the UK is required to show compassion to everyone else on earth - except its own long-suffering taxpayers?
remember my mother’s prayers and they have alway followed
OK....seriously....what the heck????. I read it again and then did a little probing into this statement. I quickly discovered whomever sent this, is correct, I have a feeling they would not like what I stand for or talk about. Original??????...I am not so sure.
I read somewhere to “beware of thoughts that come in the middle of the night.” I had a flash of brilliance last night, thinking that perhaps it would be nice to pick up growlers of Arizona beer to enjoy while ringing in the New Year. Good plan, right?
17 I shall not die, but live,
This is absolutely right. That is why we have been investing in training the application skills and educating them on the latest know-how of waterproofing and remedial repair materials. It is a commitment that we have taken on, to take us into the international sphere of waterproofing. India is a tropical country with different and variating climatic conditions from Europe with a lot of difference in the construction methods as well. Our training addresses all these issues.
Running with Scissors
"Tonight she was decked out in tight black velvet jeans, a pair of sparkly pink leg warmers and a purple satin blouse."
Malkin, in a posting following up on last week's column, said of Dunkin's decision to pull the ad, "It's refreshing to see an American company show sensitivity to the concerns of Americans opposed to Islamic jihad and its apologists."
I wanted to punch each and every single one of those women in the face.
Crushed tomatoes (organic): On sale $1.99/28 oz can, used approximately 1/3 = $.66
tit of the last bad night in the world.
Article 50
Grr!
Is it?
In 2nd (or was it 3rd?) grade, my friend Bridget and I decided to write stories about each other. We used to dictate plot lines to one another - she wanted to go on vacation in France and have Tom Cruise's look-alike son fall madly in love with her, and I'd give her an equally outlandish scenario - and then we'd bury our noses in our notebooks and write as much as we could without getting caught by the teacher. When we were finished, we'd swap notebooks and read and giggle and put in our orders for what we wanted to happen next.
Feel free to leave feedback, critiques or suggestions.
Hurry up and get up there
Well, the question is complex, indeed, so I decided to answer it in several pieces. I'll start by the part of balancing the pH, since I honestly hadn't heard of it and I was curious. I'll do my best to be objective about this answer and provide you with scientific backgrounds for this post, but what I'm writing here is my opinion. I'm no doctor, nutritionist or dietician.
as my memory rests
I also got these three parallels from 2011 Topps Update. The odd thing about the Updated Rockies is that all three of these guys are now former Rockies. Mortensen was sent to Boston for Marco Scutaro, while Daley and Ellis signed as free agents with the Yankees and Dodgers respectively.
Not sure if everyone knows but tulips are my fave colors, I alsmot colored them in purple color but then chanced my mind and I thought you would like to see others colors on my card then purple, right?!?! lol lol
Massive freelancer databases like Odesk and Elance let you search through a wide variety of freelancers — from writers to web designers — and get you the best price by including people from all over the world (including India and Russia).
I wanted to learn about Him. His nature. His character. His heart. His love.
Most airlines, like Air Canada, treat the fare adjustment like a ticket change. So you’ll be slapped with a change fee that typically ranges from $50-150.
Malcolm Stewart ... Dr. Marcus Hanson
It was very hot. The humidity crept upward and upward all day until it was oppressive by 4:30 in the afternoon. Summer wedding last hurrah. But everything was lovely. The bride was fashion-plate gorgeous. Her grandfather officiated in a touching ceremony. The bridesmaids wore the most beautiful fuchsia dresses. The flower girls did their job perfectly — I played and played and played while they walked down the aisle, taking their time spreading those pink petals with precision.
03. Exploring Soundscapes
The film starts out with Rambo, a former Army Special Forces member, going to visit a comrade from his old unit. He learns that his friend has died a particularly horrific death, having been eaten away by cancer caused by exposure to Agent Orange. We do not learn until later this means Rambo is the last man left alive from his old unit.
Prince of Persia anchored version
In my earliest memories of sacred hymns, prayer meeting music (which was often a cappella) and instrumental music, I can’t remember not hearing and “seeing” every note and chord with my ears. Dad had a deep, resonating bass voice and incredible range. Mom had an operatic soprano voice. I think I was 9 or 10 and singing either bass or tenor (sometimes alto) without knowing it.
And I'm not a lid that doesn’t fit,
Now, that’s not such a new thought. People have suggested that Joan may have been schizophrenic in the past but the simple fact is we will never know for sure. The authorities judged her based on what they believed to be true at that time. Had the technology been available she might not have been burned at the stake, she might have been lobotomised instead. We now regard both treatments as barbaric and I’m reminded of Star Trek IV where, after listening to two 20th century doctors discussing treatments in an elevator, Doctor McCoy turns to Kirk and says, "Sounds more like the goddam Spanish Inquisition." As Eagleman puts it:
- 1 large sweet onion, halved and sliced
Eminent domain
Well, ok folksies! I'm gonna let cha go, but I'll be back soon! I promise, no more 4 weeks between posts. That's far too long to be away from all you lovely people.
I mean, that when we feel stirred with anger, we ought to call upon God for help, like the Apostles, when they were tossed about with wind and storm, and He is sure to say, “Peace, be still.” But even here I would again warn you, that your very prayers against the angry feelings which urge you should be gentle, calm, and without vehemence. Remember this rule in whatever remedies against anger you may seek. Further, directly you are conscious of an angry act, atone for the fault by some speedy act of meekness towards the person who excited your anger. It is a sovereign cure for untruthfulness to unsay what you have falsely said at once on detecting yourself in falsehood; and so, too, it is a good remedy for anger to make immediate amends by some opposite act of meekness. There is an old saying, that fresh wounds are soonest closed.
Man’s best friend.
I was wrong. (all some people do at BYU is date) All grad students do at BYU is study. So that's what I did.
I am still fighting the depression. I am still struggling to understand it all. I am not in a good place these days. But... I went back and read the entry after Mom died. I really do know who my friends are. I really know they are still around. I really know that I have no clue what life will bring next, tomorrow, or eventually.
For me, it’s just scary.
I find fascinating the mixture of intense loathing of the Catholic Church, coupled with calls to remember past CATHOLIC victories, such as Poitiers, Lepanto, and especially, the victory that occurred at “the Gates of Vienna.”
My cousin’s, he took me out on a sled,
After the past week or so, I’ve came out with so many questions…
It would easy and not entirely inaccurate to simply summarise this indie sleeper hit as a teenage slacker re-telling of The Maltese Falcon but this is also a beautifully made film with Joseph Gordon-Levitt truly impressive as the smart college student who sets out to solve the death of his girlfriend amongst the rich and wealthy California youth. Their tribal world of secret linguistic codes and brutally hierarchical cliques is just as enthralling, and potentially dangerous, as the mean 1930s streets of Hammett and Chandler – a minor classic.
For my card this week I have used a stamp from my Waltzingmouse Rescue Remedies set and I sponged it with vintage photo distress ink while it was still in the nestie die. The DP is from DCWV and the ribbon, pin and pearls are from my stash.
Thank you for making a courageous decision Tunku Aziz. I hope other prominent Malays have taken notice and will follow in your footsteps.
Speak to one another with psalms, hymns and spiritual songs. Sing and make music in your heart to the Lord.. Ephesians 5:19
We become pessimistic and cynical.
mitho ‘bhipadyeta gṛha-vratānām
No Lying!!!Share
Writing about sex is troublesome for me. That’s something of a puzzle, because I can (and do) talk about sex: at the dinner table, in public, in casual conversation, in bed. I’m not shy that way. I said something mildly scandalous in that realm this afternoon while we were all sitting in the livingroom drinking cocoa. My husband muttered his protestations about propriety, to which I responded “What? This from someone who put something called ‘Lady Monkey Butt’ in my stocking?” I think the cocoa shot straight out of my mother’s nose.
This, however, is no mere Saudi phenomenon, no hateful curiosity in the rich, isolated desert. The Islamist hatred of women burns brightly across the region — now more than ever.
The materials used were MME So Sophie and Lost and Found papers and Meadow Lark accessory sheet. The alphabet was Making Memories and a "china special". The stamp is a Hero Arts stamp that I used for the border and the circle stamp is a 7 Gypsies stamp.
My card base is kraft, with a mat of ivory, and then some "chic" dp bought at Mike's pad. Didn't show who put it out because I used part of it previously and so the name is gone..sorry people. It's a soft denim colored blue and ivory so I wanted to bring that out in my flower. After cutting the different size flowers I brushed them with denim colored ink that Adirondack puts out. Now for some fun I used the Scor-Pal and did a bit of pleating out of the ivory card stock and then added some crocheted ribbon stuff to give it that vintage look. Guess I need to use some of that on myself to add to my vintage look (mine is wrinkled skin and old age spots) not so classy, me thinks. After I slapped it together I added the little flag sentiment "thank-you" found in the Hello Hyacinth set. Put a few blingers on and I'm through here.So now it's your turn to get a bag (not a live one like me) and see what you can come up with. There's lots of ideas out there, just tune into one of them and give it a go. Oh, and be sure to check out the design team's work...they are listed and linked below. For a look at the official challenge and all the rules, feel free to click HERE.
Ignore the fact I just posted.
If you can not read the numbers on the back of your remote, please look inside the remote for the white sticker containing these numbers. It might be under the small circuit board of your remote if you don’t immediately see it once the remote is opened.
Timeless ~ Parasol Protectorate Book the Last. Out now!
And while you're here why dontcha' follow along over in that there side bar? I love making new bloggy friends so if you would like, leave me a note and I'll follow ya back! :)
It’s May and our (privatised) reservoirs are half empty.
The UK’s hottest new Music Talent Show, The Voice, has been getting rave reviews across the board since it started on BBC One last month.
Ditch Trilogy Play List:
Give me poop over barf any day.
When 2011 began, I made a commitment to write a gratitude blog post for every day of the year on people, places, things, and ideas that I am grateful for.
And I’m talking about both our 4x1 AND 4x4 squads, because if we learned anything from Daegu (and I hope we did) you can never have too many quartermilers ready to go when you might possibly need them! It’s probably too late in the process to pull together our “National” teams to compete in Guadalajara this time around. But I think it is something that should be considered for future events.
To beat the proverbial dead horse I must say……. too many hobbies, not enough time!!
Laughing at defeated opponents, bragging about your achievements, overdoing it with taunts and emotes, all make you look childish. The fact is, even children should know better. An appropriate emote used at the right moment can be a beautiful thing, but when it accompanies every encounter in the game, it turns into that much more mindless spam, which brings us to our next rule.
She came back with the wrapped CD and gave it to him. He took it and walked out of the store. He went home and from then on, he went to that store everyday and bought a CD, and she wrapped it for him. He took the CD home and put it in his closet. He was still too shy to ask her out and he really wanted to but he couldn't. His mother found out about this and told him to just ask her.
Time sure does have a way of sneaking up on you. I can't believe how much all three of our kids have grown. I was curious to see and compare this years first day of school picture with their kindergarten year. I still remember each of their first day of school, Spencer was sleepy but excited, Natalie was beyond excited and Katie was timid and nervous about her first day.
After examination and cross-examination of dozens of experts, friends and family, the jury was left with more questions than answers. Questions were raised about the examiners method during autopsy. More about the use of chloroform and whether it was actually used. Someone even claimed that despite the fact Caylee was found in a garbage bag, dead, it did not mean there was homicide involved. How that makes any sense is beyond all logical thought. Yet it is this lack of professionalism that bemused jurors and placed that ‘shadow of a doubt’ in their minds. The evidence against Casey is impossibly clear, yet the lack of ‘hard’, ‘tangible’ evidence allowed her to walk free on all charges related to her daughter’s death.
Exit: Bolter Baron
We went to that point and Island where there is the greatest little Primitive Campground in the world and I told her about the night that Dad, Bruce and I had caught a lot of fish on Rubber Band Trotlines from this very spot.
Samantha Morton/Sean Penn (Sweet and Lowdown)
It started off like any other Friday. A little bit before 4:00pm we pack ourselves into the car. It may be the end of the week but there are still many kids’ activities to get to before I sleep.
Reading the info there was like a breath of fresh air. It was new hope for an already frustrated and worried mama.
1. What title should I pick for my thesis?
I got the chance to wear the EV Grin today.
Yes it's that time again, the bags are packed, the fridge has been emptied and my carriage is out in the courtyard awaiting my early departure tomorrow morning.
It is a mark of how out of touch politicians, such as Cameron, are that he seems to think people will believe that such tinkering would even come close to solving the problem.
The Post-1914 Tombstone Inscription Cards are arranged alphabetically by name and include birth and death dates or other information if listed on the tombstone. The Post-1914 Tombstone Inscription Cards are also available on 5 reels of microfilm: Z.3.40 — Z.3.44.
And then I stumbled across another decanter in a three pack of glass bottles I purchased from Ikea. It looked like it had a bigger spout and more potential as a pretty dishwashing soap dispenser....
There were 3 colors,each of an alkaline and a non alkaline earthenware glaze.
Do ask what wine they recommend with a particular dish - the combination can be pretty amazing.
I hear a chorus of crickets hum “the concords”
She needs to claw something. She would like to use the oriental rug, while we would prefer for her to use one of the alternatives we have provided. We can occasionally be found dragging our fingernails over the surfaces of these alternatives to show her how it's done. She's getting the idea.
When Taylor got up from his knees he was so distraught that the man asked him what was wrong. The man could never have understood, but Taylor himself knew what was wrong and there was only one remedy. He dug deep into his pocket for his half-crown and gave it to the man. “And how the joy came back in full flood tide to my heart! … Not only was the poor woman’s life was saved, but my life as fully realized had been saved too.”
George Harrison 'Wah Wah' 1970.
UPDATE: I succeeded in shoving my feet in Hubby’s face. He looked like he might vomit.
The man looked at Hank. “Someone is coming for you.”
The airframe is swallowed to the worm home without the done way.
He’s right.
After his recent run-in with the almighty (they were very God fearing folk in the days of 1644) the Royalist General leaves a "be back later note at the pearly gates" and decides to fight his way out of trouble (see below). The battle is confused and hectic and many more dice are rolled:
A Short Review
South Africa’s economic difficulties are placing Lesotho’s economy at a crossroads, as the government struggles to push big rocks up the mountain to balance the national budget.
This post covers the week from April 8 to April 14, 2012
In the times when photographers used film they couldn't do without filters, while today it's pretty uncommon to find someone who use them.
The things I do to my liver.
After catching her fiance with another woman, Kate Bradley returns to San Diego to clear her head. The last thing she needs is romance, but after meeting Calisto she’s drawn to him in ways she doesn’t understand.
And that was kind of how I felt today. Things just kept catching me off guard.
low-bottom drunks all shuffling out
- brian lavelle - empty transmissions - sonic oyster cassettes - 2011
From Nepal, it will be time to test our wide-eyed-tourist faces on India, where we’ll be volunteering for, hopefully, up to six months… somewhere.
“We are in the process of revisiting the recommendations that we had presented and in some instances may fine tune some of the recommendations,” Ms. Skrypniak said. “We are in the process of undertaking this analysis now and therefore have delayed releasing the final report.”
So anyway wait for 30 minutes then talk to him and he’ll give you one Legend Festival coin. You will also get some useless 30 minute buff called Legend Sweet Syrup Buff.
Step 3 – Choose the type of bulb you want to grow
In this country called My House—a place somewhere in the dystopian future where Vampires are the norm and werewolves are taken for granted—there are always two. That is because Love is a four-letter word and although it reigns, Love Triangles Reign supreme!
If you haven’t seen the video or hasn’t really gotten the point I was trying to get across well, the image at the bottom is a screenshot from the #KONY2012 video. I don’t wanna say it but I have to, Pyramid symbolism… *hint hint
How strange is this combination of proximity and separation. That ground – seconds away – thousands of miles away. __Charles A. Lindbergh
I just use water.
I could go on.
But you can be sure that this is not a ‘them and us’ issue between NTs and OTS, for there are plenty of perfectly ordinary everyday people who find that ‘shit happens’ – if you will pardon me for being so blunt.
Members of all major parties needed no reminding of how prominent the survey was. Speaking toward where his interests typically lie, Hannes Hólmsteinn Gissurarson segued quickly into using the survey to prove the efficiency of his favourite party, the Independence Party. He claimed the survey revealed two facts about Icelanders, “One… that they live a good life and that they are generally quite satisfied with their lot. From 1991 (the year the Independence Party got into office), Iceland has gone through an unprecedented era of economic and legal reforms… a lot of entrepreneurial energy has been released.”
The GDP for the USA in 2010 was $15.2 trillion.
I put all of my big charts and activities in a laundry hamper. They usually fit perfectly in here and are pretty easy to find. I used to store them in a cabinet but I had a hard time finding what I needed. This is working well.
134. “Your attitude is either the lock on, or the key to the door of success.” – Denis Waitley
I mentioned that my meal planning day had changed.
But who says I can’t at least have the coffee cake? Especially one that doesn't cost an arm and a leg while at the same time adding to my midsection. So instead of making a dessert last week, I decided to sweeten up my mornings (which can always use a little sweetening) with this breakfast beauty. Bananas. Macadamia nuts. Coconut. Seriously, you can't go wrong.
We always have room at our seder table for one more guest.
The fair will take place in the events centre in the Red Cow Moran Hotel. It runs from 11am to 6pm. Entry is just €5. Some sites are offering 2for 1 special offers so look out for them.
Unfortunately, nerves got the better of Ronan and he was unable to perform. Simon however, had already seen the audition tapes from the scouts and took Ronan into an unused dressing room and got him to sing in there with his mum for support.
½ cup vegetable oil
For me, distance equals perspective. I hadn't driven down most of these side streets in well over a decade, and it really opened my eyes. The places where I used to happily ride my bike were now...seedy. A little creepy. And more than a little sad.
and coffee aboundings
1 tablespoon apple cider vinegar
The barry political-crime machine is masterful at raising huge sums of cash from the corporate tyrants he serves. (Not to mention airhead bimbos like George Clooney and Tom Hanks.) While doubts exist his 2012 campaign can match the ocean of money raised in 2008, barry is already way ahead of any potential primary opponents, who’ve raised exactly zero to date.
In life there are cases when a woman struggling hides a passion felt by a man, while he also assiduously playing the love that does not feel to it.
8 Person tag match is up now….Mexican America taking on The Pope, Devon, Miss Hancock, and Tara.
Your ignorance is not bliss
Wow, I am so freaking excited about the World Cup. Seriously, I have two things on my mind right now, and those two things are soccer players’ thighs.
Also on Katniss’s thoughts – why did she explain so much? In the movie, Gale calls Katniss “Catnip.” I take this to be some kind of affectionate name, they’re dating or been childhood friends, whatever, cool. Yet in the book this turns into some long backstory of how Katniss said her name quietly so Gale has always thought it was Catnip. I don’t really care. I didn’t know this name was some elaborate thing. Katniss, it’s a nickname, get over it. Also the meeting with Peeta and the bread. Why was it this large drawn out thing of “Peeta must have been slapped because of me, because he wanted to feed me, so he burned the bread that was conveniently in the oven when I was around.” Katniss. The bread burnt and Peeta’s a nice guy. That’s it. There’s not some big plan. Get some more thoughts.
I think I would take a step back, stop blaming your ex and Marilyn for everything and consider where you might have gone wrong (at least a little).
I was in Porters and saw these darling stuffed animal blankets and thought I would give it a try!
1-3 EARLY AMERICANA and WESTERN EXPANSION. The wide-open frontier. Colonial period. Oregon Trail, prairie schooners. Fur trappers and buffalo hunters. Manifest Destiny. Louisiana Purchase, Louis & Clark. Daniel Boone. Coonskin caps. Negotiating with natives. Bold missionaries. You're on your own. Individual initiative and self-reliance. Majestic expanse of unconquerable Nature.
- Mike & Lynn A.
Our first destination on the way though was Decatur, IN to visit friends Barb and Paul, who live on the outskirts of Monroe, IN and to see their new home; they sold the farm house and barn to one of the sons and built a beautiful spacious home on the property. I did not take a picture of their spacious 2000 sq ft. open floor plan with the same square footage downstairs in the finished basement complete with another kitchen. Barb joked that not only could they wheel around if they ever end up in wheel chairs but if they need live in care takers, they can live on one floor and the caregivers on the other. Barb has retired from her catering and cake decorating business but with 7 grand daughters from ages 3 to 23 and 2 sons and families all living near along with cousins and long time friends she is always cooking and baking. She has a small chest freezer filled with cookies alone that she bakes continuously for everyone to enjoy. She had a pie ready for us, something called Indiana Cream which is delicious and which Jerry, the pie eater in chief has been eating nightly. Barb has been using the kitchen downstairs and said since moving in Thanksgiving she still has not cooked a meal in the upstairs kitchen.
I love discovering new things /seeing new things. And, right here behind my laptop, I spotted someone’s FB status… it had this verse below:
Though the show will be coming to an end Kevin and Alex will still be around on Revision3, Kevin will continue with Foundation and Alex will still be on the Totally Rad Show. The two have also spoken about random reunion live shows, when well who knows there not done yet. There are about 12 episodes left until the finally and you can bet I’ll be watching every sing one. Diggnation has been one of my favorite podcast and will be missed by me and many others, but as we all know all good things must come to an end.
The third test is whether the ruling party will voluntarily cede power when it is defeated at the polls or resort to violence, intimidation and thuggery in order to stay in office. We are yet to submit to that test, but the signs are not good.
But her daughter is my best friend.
“Men occasionally stumble over the truth, but most of them pick themselves up and hurry off as if nothing had happened.” - Winston Churchill
- 9 bare rooted strawberry plants
o Event planner
Somebody is going to have to play a pretty powerful wildcard, as the tenacity and sheer staying power of the Greek political classes, with the backing of the EU commission, seems to have been seriously underestimated.
This morning at the hospital we brought all the kids in the playroom so the aides could air out their bedrooms. Slowly the kids were let back in their rooms, and we were left with Alina, Cristi, and sometimes Paula in the playroom. The only other patients on the floor Sunday night were four (young) teenagers who had passed out drunk. We decided that Paula'screaming all day might have taught them a lesson! David spent the morning outside with Ion, so things were more peaceful inside. After lunch we all went out to enjoy the nice weather. I brought out Raul, as he was awake. There was a new nurse on his floor, so I don't think she knew who I was, but she let me take him outside, she just told me to "bring him back" haha. We sat outside while everyone else went to a local shop/stand to buy water, then it was time to go back to our kids.
My first instinct was to simply pick him up and sit him on the island, next to where I had retrieved the clean rag, and to tell him to wait while I went to look for something. He obediently stayed. I then went back to the door and got on my hands and knees and began looking for a piece of finger. It was difficult, however, because there were a lot of wood chips and dry leaves the color of skin and I kept picking up things that weren't a finger portion. My friend soon saw me on my hands and knees and asked what I was doing. I told her that I thought part of the 5-year-old's finger came off and I was looking for it. She got down and started helping me. No sooner did she began, than I glanced over to the bottom of the door, and attached to it, by a thin line of blood, was what I was looking for. I pulled it off the door and put it in my hand, and when I looked at it, I gasped and nearly threw up because it was the entire top portion of the 5-year-old's finger, from about 1/4 inch below the base of his nail, cut off at about a 45-degree angle. I think what got to me the most was the fact that his little fingernail was dirty, just like it always was when it was attached to his body. I was holding a portion of my son's body in my hand, a part so familiar, and natural when it was attached, but so horrifying when dismembered! I let out a curse word, which I'm not proud of (I guess too many PG-13 movies), then I ran back to the kitchen, and I don't know if I got the 5-year-old boy off the island or put his severed finger portion in a bag of ice water first, but somehow, at some point, the 5-year-old boy ended up on the couch, with his severed finger in a Ziploc bag. I then called the local doctor to see if he was working in town, but there was no answer, so I told my friend I was going to have to go to the big town. Without hesitation she said that she would stay with the little kids and take care of lunch for my big kids.
Why you?
Speaking of inspiration.
Well I hadn’t noticed but the people really noticed that they didn’t really want us around,
Plum Jam .
So, what's the update then?
Incoming sound quality of the Jabra is good but sometimes lacks a bit of brightness.
*dozes off*.
His brain stopped registering.
Blessed are those who hunger and thirst for righteousness, for they will be filled.
Download:
The first four books of the planned 12-book series are published by Orion this month, February, with the remaining eight titles to follow in May and August. The first, The Beasts in the Jar, includes the story of creation and readers are introduced to the gods Zeus, Poseidon and Hades, as well as the myths of Theseus and the Minotaur, Icarus, Pandora, Arachne and Midas, among others. The series will also include less well-known stories, like the sharp-eyed King Sisyphus. Each of the stories carries colour illustrations by Anthony Lewis.
A wise swami once said, “Observation without judgment is the greatest spiritual practice of all.” I would have to agree. But I would say it this way: Become a cosmic fly on the wall of your own experience. Trust what you see.
By Ray Gorham
To serve-
I suggest you check it out. Great stories, live music and free beer combine to make a nice little evening.
This is the craft project for tomorrow. Can you guess what it's going to be? I can tell you, the Hubs was not thrilled when he called while he was out (he called from Walmart to ask if we needed any goat's milk, and to inform me that it would be a shame if we did, because they were sold out ??!! I think his point was that they even sell goats' milk in Walmart is a bit unbelievable) anyway, I sent him into the Nether Region of the craft department at Wally World in search of a 4" styrofoam ball.He whined, but he did bring one home (good boy), so this will turn into something tomorrow (after I make a mess of the packed away Barbie stuff in the basement rooting around for a plastic Barbie hairbrush to use on this yarn). Stay tuned.
I agree with these angry drivers; they're not wrong; but channel the anger, folks.
Dad, you were right. But don’t let it go to your head.
Posted By: Rayelan
3/4 cup frozen peas
After a short time they disappear into the ether because the woman they 1st met has morphed into this complete and utter nutter with whom they’re mostly happy (“Cos I can cook, don’t look too shabby and put out” .. yes I said that to a guy during a break up scene many moons ago .. One of my finer moments .. sigh) but of whom they’re scared shitless.
Oh, gosh, I haven't said it here before (I don't think), but I really hate myself.
This has occurred in the jurisdictions where water and electricity resources are available to export to the United States. Mainly NL, Que, BC & AB but that is not to say there hasn't been equal pressure put on other provinces resources and politicians.
Philosophical background: the cosmic and natural order
On the other hand, a choice of dining outlets include Delicious, TGI Friday's, Starbucks, Dragon-i and lots more, you have to check it out yourself. Various other retailers at the mall include Machines, Petsmore.com, The Body Shop, Caring Pharmacy, Pandora and Royal Selangor.
But that said, I will also be taking a short blogging break for two or three weeks. One of my best friends is visiting me from Germany, and we have decided to head out into the Rockies for a road trip! I cannot wait... in my opinion there is nowehere as gorgeous as the Rocky Mountains in the summer, and the Jasper-Banff Highway, also called the Icefields Parkway, is simply paradise on earth (well, if you exclude all thr tourists, that is :-)) So after this one, my next post is likely to be at the beginning of August, unless of course I get inspired at a campsite or two or three!
Sent: Thursday, April 05, 2012 6:43 AM
Bang Gang In heaven IS
‘Waltz King’ was most likely originally presented in mono, however the DVD presents it in 2.0 stereo here. This doesn’t prove to be a problem for the most part, coming across clearly. It would seem that the European theatrical run would have had stereo sound, so it’s likely Disney recorded the film in stereo and is presented faithfully here. There are two moments in the scene where Schani meets Jetty in the music shop, where the dialog seems to be sourced from a different source. They are brief, but as obviously sourced from a scratched up and hallow sounding print. Makes one curious why those 2 lines needed a different, more damaged source.
Mothers and fathers are people too. They were just trying to do their best within the confines of the world that created them.
THIS:
He grabbed his wounded arm in mock protest and then quickly snatched the paper away from her before she could strike him again. He glanced at the list as Barbara reached for her glass. *If you could have any message printed on your underwear, what would it be? How many bloggers does it take to put panties on a goat?* “Don’t you think you have had too much of that already?” he asked her. She had, but she shook her head dramatically, taking a big gulp and draining what was left.
Saturday saw us ready to continue with the creativity, doing yet another different thing. In the morning TC challenged us with a small canvas and easel. Her example used both sides of the canvas and I decided this was a good thing, esp as I wasn't too happy with my first side.
Which, yeah, I mean, that crap is weird all right. But let's make it weirder. The tiles have been showing up for 30 YEARS. Since the 1980s, peeps.
“Common Sense and the Evolution of Reality” Most people, most of the time, take for granted that “reality” is identical to everyday common sense. In terms of what we might call naïve realism, basic properties of Nature like time and space, matter and energy, separate objects, the arrow of time, etc., are regarded as givens, or as absolutes. The same is true for subjective properties like color, tones, and taste. But we know that none of this is actually true. Science, especially the cognitive and neurosciences, and physics, have revealed that naïve realism is based upon an extremely tiny slice of a much greater reality that never reaches conscious awareness, and that our sense of reality is thus a crude cartoon model of what is “really” out there. When we attempt to see beyond the veil of common sense, using the lens of science focused by multidisciplinary scholarship, inklings of a greater reality can be glimpsed. Those glimpses appear to resonate with holistic descriptions of reality as provided by mystics throughout the ages. One consequence of appreciating that naïve realism is a special case of a larger, more complex reality, is that commonly reported experiences regarded as anomalous by the scientific mainstream, or labeled paranormal by the general public, are instantly reframed as expected and perfectly normal.
Thank you Lela for playing! I hope you enjoy your package :)
Ray – Thank you for responding so promptly. It is not our intent to assign busywork. We do expect students to demonstrate proficiency with the IRB processes in relationship to qualitative research.
I am a huge, huge fan of children's books (probably because my mother was a children's librarian when I was growing up) so I started him a collection of books and stuffed animals to go with the books.
So tonight Fred and I took the motorcycle out for a spin. The temps were fairly warm and the weather beautiful. Very nice ride until a green Subaru Forester decides to switch lanes without looking to see if anyone was there (US, WE WERE THERE…), then they waved at us… like “thanks for letting us in”… we didn’t… Fred was the one flipping the bird that time… sorry ladies, but switching lanes again and rolling down your window sheepishly looking at us after nearly killing us is not an acceptable apology.
I am so pissed, I can't even explain it. So...your thoughts???
Along with multiple holiday seasons of not caring...
The Madison-based Bach Dancing and Dynamite Society just turned 20 and just wrapped up three weekends (12 mostly sold-out performances of six programs) of summer concerts to mark its passing from adolescence into early adulthood.
"In recent years," the New York Times' James Risen reports, "dozens of Karzai family members and close allies have taken government jobs, pursued business interests or worked as contractors to the United States government, allowing them to shape policy or financially benefit from it."
Andrew Scott was named as Best Supporting Actor. The 35-year-old won the award for his role in the audio play Referee, after having recently come to the wider public attention for his performance as Jim Moriarty in BBC One’s Sherlock (created and written by Steven Moffat and Mark Gatiss). The BBC Audio Award was presented to Scott by David Tennant and June Whitfield (Absolutely Fabulous, Doctor Who ‘The End of Time’).
Today was an interesting day. I don't think that "interesting" is the right word, but it was all I could think of...
- sesame seeds
YAY ME!!! I received my swapped out ATC's for February from the All Things Tim Yahoo Group and from the Creative Block- Stamper's Anonymous Yahoo Group. Now I am working on my March swaps...can't wait to to give and receive. If you have never swapped and enjoy getting other crafter's work, then give it a whirl...it's so wonderful and fun!!!
Thinking back to Kant’s answer to his posed question about how nature is materially possible, there are a few striking points that are noticed. First, nature is materially possible by the ‘constitution of our sensibility’. That is to say, nature is possible in its material appearances as it accords with the sensibility (over against the understanding and/or reason more generally). In other words, the faculty of cognition that allows for the possibility of nature to be represented to a consciousness is sense-intuition. Second, this possibility is predicated on the affective encounter between sense-cognition and (possible) objects. Third, these possible objects of experience are unknown in themselves. Only their appearance to a given cognition as the latter represents its intuition of the encounter to itself might be ‘known’. Fourth and last, the objects in themselves are said to be ‘wholly distinct’ from their appearance.
he was so sick of hearing them complain about their feet!
Margarine
So once again, I think I should get some kind of props for even remembering that, let alone finding a place in everyday conversation to use it. But alas, judgement had already been passed and I was labeled as "the group Wiccan" for the night.
With that, here are my heroes of 2011:
New Air-conditioned Mario Bros.New Air-conditioned Mario Bros.
- Dominic Rushe, The Guardian
I chose Kostritzer because I wanted something dark, but as this was an experiment I didn't want to risk anything expensive that I actually liked. Normally I'd add about 375ml of water but I went for a 500ml bottle of beer to start with.
‘Sadly, no!’ I replied. ‘What with all my novels and gossip and crochet, there’s no time left over for ferns.’
1 pointed
CLOSING DOWN....Crafty Emma's Store is closing down. I've had a fantastic two years and would like to thank you all for your custom and support. There will be random special offers whilst stocks clear....currently you can grab 25% off all card blanks and 8x8 cello bags.
I say all that to say this: we are all different. What’s good for me is not necessarily good for you and vice versa. We each have to take responsibility for our own health and the behaviors that effect it. It’s called personal responsibility. But in the city of New York and increasingly around the country, we no longer have a choice about what we can eat and drink, or smoke. The latest attack on personal freedoms is a proposal from Mayor Bloomberg (is he still in office?). Things are going so well in NYC that the Mayor has time to worry about what we are all eating. It wasn’t enough that he has banned trans fats and required all restaurants to post calorie counts on their menus. Now he wants food preparers to reduce salt in their foods by 25% by 2014.
a bit of an identity crisis..
“I’m sorry,” Chris offered. “I’ve been distracted by these pictures. I’m trying to figure out where I saw them before.”
Plus, I bought a backup drive while I was at it. It was chugging along merrily, until it reached 26% copied, sometime last night. Now, all of a sudden, it's telling me that I need to connect the storage device. The darn thing IS connected. It's got a green light on it, and everything. I guess I'm going to have to pay someone to come in and get things straightened out.
8. Haughty: A feeling of superiority
Bewitching Book Tours is scheduling book tours, promotion and reviews for Crushing Hearts and Black Butterfly Publishing.
Here are the people I’m tagging:
Losing to UMBC 71-67 on January 17 was the nadir for Holland, the frustration of which contributed to his game-high 24 points in the team’s mid-February 85-53 drubbing of the Retrievers.
Yet another explanation will be the worry pertaining to stability. Women enjoy to get a developer nevertheless desire zero perhaps the fret involving sacrificing as well as detrimental the idea. They just don’t desire the problem involving holding a thing consequently exorbitantly high-priced after they visit the place of work, step out pertaining to lunch break as well as phase right local mall. However, holding an innovative Louis Vuitton, Gucci, Prada, Versace as well as Chanel is surely an wide open request for you to purse-snatchers. A new 7 legend louis vuitton 2010 handbags gives along danger component pretty greatly with no limiting in seems to be. You already know you may need certainly not worry anything but for you to the rest of the entire world, you happen to be holding actual cigarettes!
Time should not be wasted on arguing hypothetically on whether Mick McCarthy remaining in his job would have kept them up, nobody will ever know, but it cannot be denied the hideous timing of his removal and subsequent plunge into desperation that has thrust a reluctant Terry Connor into an unwanted limelight. His future will be decided in the summer they say, but he is not to blame for this relegation, the grotesque incompetence of the hiring process by the Moxey and Morgan double act is, it has been a fine mess indeed.
Sha’von Patterson is so troubled he can barely speak about the shooting. His older brother was watching out for him to the end, just as his mother had told him to all his life. His death changed everything.
There is no mistaking my Curse as a blessing. I was never allowed that luxury. It did not play nice before turning rabid. It has almost always been there, inside me, eating me away.
Now on to Shikes' beer itself. It's a big recipe, an imperial pilsner that comes in at 8.7 percent ABV and 73 IBUs (incidentally, Ska brewed a standard pilsner as no. 3 in the Local Series in 2005).
I really didn't like the color of the cabinets (the same that I have in the kitchen too) and since it is the first room you get into from the garage we all set all sort of things that we have in hand on the washer and dryer. So I am always moving things from the washer to the dryer or vice versa.
We keep her family, friends and fans in our deepest thoughts and prayers…
I finished reading the HG trilogy yesterday…
My favorite place? Right where God would have me to be.
As I’m checking through results this morning, I see that USATF President Stephenie HIghtower is debating whether or not to “waive” the rule that defending World Champions must compete at our National Championships in order to defend at Worlds.
Kristy set up the trampoline, lets hope that is the end of the snow :(
5 spring onion bulbs, sliced
Stevia, to taste
i'm reluctant to say this crazy sentimental-ness can affect my horror movie toughness. So I thought I would just come clean and discuss a few horror flicks that cause me to bring out the tissues. I'll try not to cry...
I'll enter those woods
Scrapping that first commercial is probably a half million dollars or so in talent and production costs down the drain (plus the cost of the air time).
A beautiful lamb shoulder from the Halifax Seaport Market smoked and roasted in the Weber OTS
3. Bring to the boil over high heat. Reduce heat to low and cover. The liquid should simmer at the merest blip; use a heat diffuser/tamer mat if necessary. Cook for 2 hours, stirring occasionally to prevent the rice from sticking to the bottom of the pot and scorching. The rice will have "blossomed" (the grains will have swelled and split). Remove the chicken and set aside. Continue cooking the congee for another 1 hour, stirring occasionally, until it is thick, creamy and almost smooth. Taste; season with more salt to taste if necessary.
It’s surprises like this one that make me wonder why I ever liked cats in the first place and what insanity leads me to keep them around when all they really do is terrorize my home and expect me to clean up their excrement. Damn you, you little fuzzy balls of evil. Damn your cute little asses right to hell.
ARGA RATING: 8.12/10.00
In just under ten minutes, she and Blue Bart (my completely on-the-spot made-up name for the squeegee) had corralled and pushed all the water out the door and onto our side patio.
Camp Atterbury Public Affairs
Yes, after 44 games, split evenly away from home and at home, a ridiculously large amount of points and an even larger amount of fan satisfaction following the successes of Paolo Di Canio’s side, Swindon have bounced back at the first attempt to the league that’s been their home for a while.
My husband and I can’t seem to get through the weekend with out going to Lowe’s or Home Depot and this weekend was no different.
pristine look.
We got there first, and The Man declared his intent to grab the condo with the biggest television so he could watch the Olympics. This we did, and were pleasantly surprised to see that this room was also by far the nicest condo we had ever seen. It was tastefully and expensively furnished, and had actual art on the walls that was not seashell-based. The master bedroom (which we grabbed somewhat shamefacedly, but, y'know, still GRABBED) was huge, with a super-nice and comfy pillowtop mattress. And the blockout shades - OH, my friends, these blockout shades? The electric kind, inside the windows? That MAKE THE ROOM PITCH BLACK AT NOON? I am just a little jonesing to have them installed in my house like RIGHT NOW.
The other great fascination - and in complete contrast to everything else on telly (which was all black and white up until Wimbledon 1967, and remained mostly black and white for many years after) - were the "trade test colour films". All fairly short, some merely instructional (how cars are made, the history of plastic, and other dull subjects for a kiddie-winkie), some just weirdly psychedelic, they were entrancing and magical to me!
And my hands — my hands have been covered in dirt, caked in mud, as I dabble in the things of the world and define myself by its standards.
Selsor’s execution is next Tuesday.
Apologies for not having posted since Tuesday. Sometimes I really just don’t have anything to say. And hey, I still don’t - but I missed you too much to stay away any longer.
It just makes me crazy that I can see the similarities in tastes, conversation styles, looks, interests, etc., and yet I’m supposed to pretend that we are not related.
James’s sister broke into a trot as she came down the long lane. Emma was to be one of Zanna’s newehockers, so she wore a new dress the same shade of royal blue the bride had chosen. When she sprinted to a breathless halt, Emma reached for Abby’s hand. “What’s this we hear about Zanna not bein’–”
“The Government must ensure that these work permits are not valid for the UK.
The Campbell's version of stuffed peppers was something I used to dread... a slimy, wrinkled, parboiled punishment on a plate. You stuck a fork in them and they burst, and this liquid that tasted like over-boiled green beans ran out and filled up your dish as the pepper deflated and laid there like a gross saggy wrinkled Jolly Green Giant scrotum.
We have a mental image of goats as funny-looking animals with little beards who eat cans or shirttails, or who’ll butt you if you’re not looking. But God uses goats and sheep to illustrate something very serious. One day He will say, “Sheep on My right hand, goats on My left!” The significance of God’s right hand is that those on the right are favored and those on the left are disfavored.
Yield: 12 servings.
Papa and Ashlyn (17 months) at the playground
A couple months back, I received an email that changed my life. It was a request to submit the missing information. As luck (or fate) would have it, I had JUST submitted Forbidden into the Amazon Novel Competition and was unable to present anything. But the door did not slam shut on my fingers. I was given another shot…not just with presenting my original novel, Defiance Rising, but was also able to propose the intial chapter of a YA dystopian book I’ve been writing, Ignite.
Thought Moon!
I suddenly had a brainwave for a calendar theme (based on recently bought stash) that I thought would not only be funky, fashionable and very suitable for office life, but would also be particularly apt for this year of celebrating various British events such as the London Olympics and the Diamond Jubilee. I even imagined making calendars as li'l belated new year gifts for my team mates in the office ... I was really enthusiastic about the whole thing!
Sarah Parish (THE PILLARS OF THE EARTH), and there's a bunch of gorgeous young actors: Lindsay Pulsipher, Matt Barr, Jena Malone, Boyd Holbrook, Tom McKay, Jonathan Fredrick. The series was mostly shot in Romania, Europe and a lot of Romanian actors will appear in smaller roles.
cold kept off
Evaluate all available contracts from service providers at the new Home. Often, the Time Warner Cables will not advertise specials and deals to their current customers. USpromodeals.com is an excellent way to keep your providers honest. When your Interacting with Time Warner Cable to relocate your service, mention that you were on an authorized site USpromodeals.com and saw a lower price. They can give you that advertised price to you.
Format: Trade Paperback, 112 pages
1) Taking photos without enough light. The iPhone will always adjust through its shutter speed and ISO but the results are usually blurry and noisy.
Isaacs spoke about the quiet, calm patience he witnessed last year as people stood in long lines to try to receive relief items and the loving kindness they exhibited as they waited until those around them had eaten first. The people came together quickly to meet each other’s needs.
The venue was the Baum, our 2012 Pub of the Year, quiet on a Tuesday and with mostly stronger beers on. We chose the mild, on sale (and brewed) to support CAMRA's Mild in May month. This offering, Green Mill's Cat's Whiskers, was a little stronger than usual (these days) at 4% and was jet black with a tight creamy head. It was full flavoured, with a touch of roast, luscious dark malts, a hint of chocolate and just the merest smidgen of hopping to hold it together. In perfect cask condition, it was good. Very good. We had a second, so much did we enjoy it and texted the brewer to tell him. He texted back, pleased.
Not everything though. Just enough. Enough to cause an angry gasp- a sharp look.
Free-Range Kids are old-fashioned kids with sun on their faces, dirt on their pants and a story to tell instead of another trophy for showing up. They are confident, happy and ready to take on the world.
We feasted on;
Oh, backing up a little, I love Frank and Dean's banter. Frank is hilarious. We're getting a nice, quick overview of just how big Dick's reach is, even if nothing makes much sense.
*Sigh*. What on earth did that mean? What is the sub text there? That really got me thinking. I came to the conclusion that I didn’t want to waste any more years (yes, I mean years) sending it to people who had hundreds more manuscripts teetering on the edge of desks. I actually believe now, a lot of getting published is luck. Right place right time sort of luck. They can’t publish everyone and you can’t run a business on luck.
Then you’re forced to make a decision and then you hurt some people’s feelings no matter what decision you choose. It’s ugly. If I had it my way, I would never make a decision for the rest of my life.
One very pleasant weekend, I had the pleasure of spending some time with fellow blogger buddies Elaine and Jacqueline. We hugged, had skinny pizza, yakked about makeup, yakked about life at large, shopped, had bubble tea, and generally had an awesome time! This is the spoils of the day out =)
Preheat oven to 350°F. Grease 2 large baking dishes and set aside.
I have been avoiding yard sales because they aren’t very healthy for me and not the best way to shop. Oh and it was winter so there weren’t many. Now, they’re back and I can’t always resist. I always think I’ll find some treasure and I usually end up with more things I don’t need or can’t haggle for what I do want.However, I got some really cool things recently. If you aren’t my mom or R, you might like them but they’re a little more skeptical. Come see!I bought this “Redoute Roses” book on Half.com a few months ago for our bedroom. It has 40+ prints in it and I plan to cut the seams and frame them for the guest room. I think I paid $5 for the book including shipping.I thought it would be the larger version maybe 8×10 but it’s really a little larger than 5×7. 3-5 framed in a row would look nice downstairs when we paint. It’s also sewn instead of glued in so I can easily cut the strings and cut out the prints very neatly for framing.But back to the office. It’s the same shade of “Toasted Almond” in Olympic Paint with ultra white trim and dark floors. I currently have two rugs to cover the space, as well as random bookshelves and a desk from my great-aunt. At an estate sale this weekend, I got this incredible large navaho/persian patterned rug. It is definitely larger than 8×10 but I didn’t measure it before rolling it into the car. It was machine woven so it’s not valuable but after a thorough cleaning, it will be perfect for the large office floor space. I’m going to move the floral one to my craft room since I have more pink in there.I also found this cool large gold frame for $5 and a smaller (4×6) pewter one for $1.The gold one is actually wood (carved or not, who knows?) with a pretty floral pattern.
In a letter to Emerson, Lydia Brandt, Balentine’s attorney, said prosecutors are needlessly rushing an execution date as she plans to file a federal case on behalf of her client.
This 12 X 12 Layout was done for a challenge and the reason I chose the theme 'dream' and this photo is because right now, my dream is feeling as good as I did when I took that photo back in December, just before the holidays, just before this whole 'hip problem' began to escalate...and I will you know, get back there I mean.
Stand back…stand in awe…yes, that is some powerful revelation taking place in the deep spot and God is that MAGNIFICENT! God. IS. Capable… of delivering HIS promises!
“Harold, they were just errant Jehovah Witnesses looking for a place to rest their feet, or needing a gardener, always wanting donations, and belief. I made sure their toes were relaxed, the soil was tilled, and the donation a memory. Nothing special. Anyway, I’m not for hire. The last one I talked with sailed ship with a donkey, another woman, and a bag of pistachios.”
Well, yay! It's like that wonderful day in 1962 when we were told "You don't have Nixon to kick around any more." CAMY won't be spewing their wildly skewed and twisted views of booze marketing anymore -- good news -- but there's going to be a another federal booze agency that will inevitably be infiltrated and turned by New Drys to turn out taxpayer-funded anti-booze propaganda. Bad news.
This is the price I have to pay for making a rash decision during the time he failed to call me. He missed to call and I made big fuss about it. How immature I am you say; yes very true again, I will not contend.
What this also poses though is an etiquette issue. The crumbly casing holds fairly well, but does need to be handled oh-so-carefully.
History is repeating itself in its most cruel way and nobody seems to care. We are scared. Here in Gaza we are scared of being incarcerated, interrogated, hit, tortured, bombed, killed. We are afraid of living, because every single step we take has to be considered and well-thought, there are limitations everywhere, we cannot move as we want, say what we want, do what we want, sometimes we even cant think what we want because the occupation has occupied our brains and hearts so terrible that it hurts and it makes us want to shed endless tears of frustration and rage!
This one-star review was headed up "Lacks morality" and included the words: "For those who think "this looks like a cute book", think again. I checked this book out at the library and actually had to have a discussion with my kids about why we don't marry people of the same gender. As a Christian with high moral standards I don't have to teach my kids that such things are acceptable. It is not acceptable to God and it is not acceptable to me. I hate it when people are so concerned with "political correctness" that they worry more about offending people than offending God."
“One would hope that when faced with these constraints, the communities would pull together to fill each others’ gaps. What we are seeing is the opposite,” said Jack Herrmann, senior adviser and chief of public health preparedness programs for the National Association of County and City Health Officials.
~Marcia Rose (founding teacher of Taos Mountain Sangha)
I always thought the Philippines was better off because at least we never had an apartheid. We never disallowed dark-skinned people from working in certain places except maybe in the entertainment industry. Artistas have to be beautiful, which means they have to be white. There are a few lucky ones who overcome this pigmented obstacle, but that’s the thing about it, they are but a few. Dark ones usually take up roles like the contrabida who makes the bida’s life miserable, or they’re the comedian who is always made fun of for being ugly.
I am a green girl, so you will see a theme with the fabrics I had on hand.
All this wonderfulness is on our way to the park. At this rate, I’m not sure when we’ll actually make it to the park…
I watched this thinking of Gotye's song - "Somebody that I used to know...."- only it is somewhere not someone. Utterly disorientating - whiile impressed at the progress, the cleansing look of all the sites left, the careful recycling and the hard work from many people, it is hard not to feel depressed. The rebuild is slow to take off - signs or repair and construction are out there in the suburbs, but not here in the Red Zone, where we have not been allowed to enter since Feb 2011 unless in controlled bus tours or following fenced walkways to farewell the Cathedral.
So, yeah, recommendations welcome.
He also said that every single woman who had been sitting where I sat at some point encountered this problem. He said that the reluctance I feel towards talking about this with him, is just a reflection of my general reluctance. That by placing the fault with him, I am sabotaging my own healing. It doesn’t feel like I am. I mean, I want to talk about it. Not want – more need to. I feel this overwhelming pressure coming from inside, accompanied with an urge to want to just talk and talk and talk and talk – until I’m drained. Just not with T.
Allow them to drain and serve them with mashed potato.
Any environmental company can be a KMBI partner and the donation will help KMBI to do their project like, river clean ups, urban gardening, recycling, clean up drives, waterways de-clogging, tree and mangrove planting.
Now I have to say that I too have issues with the IAAF’s selection process which basically takes the “AOY” and turns it into a popularity contest. Take the men’s finalists for example: Usain Bolt, Yohan Blake, and David Rudisha. While Blake and Bolt did indeed have nice seasons, with a couple of high points, their overall seasons were not extraordinary. Not on par with athletes like Mo Farah and Robert Harting. But Jamaican fans are rabid and they vote in huge numbers – over and over – resulting in the popular Bolt emerging as AOY on the men’s side. At the end of the day that’s the decision that should have us looking at the IAAF system of selecting the AOY.
I gave them their cash and they let me go.
Upon arrival, Jason informed Scott that the test rules had recently changed. While the manilla rope test was essentially the same, candidates would now be required to chop through a railroad tie twice and bend the blade into a circle to pass . . . Jason has a wicked sense of humor.
“Uhhm yeah, okay sure.” Jennifer said as she frowned and raised a brow at the same time. It would have been safe to conclude that he was either a lunatic or a burnout if not for the strong suspicions that he was either sick or actively hallucinating. Even one of the wilder conjectures that she didn’t want to entertain seriously were not entirely out of the realm of possibility. Those she held half un-thought for now, though she wouldn’t be surprised if she were the one with a hallucination. “Just go on down the stairs and we can get started with that” she advised and he clapped. As that clap of his hands created a great vague gray cloud, all thought of shoving his back to send him tumbling right down the steps inexplicably flew forgotten from her head. Instead, she just followed him downstairs to her makeshift lab.
I broke it Mike. I broke my promise
My third shot consisted of a PW and a nice high floater to land it softly onto the green. I would have a 20 footer for a par.
I’m also going to pull the introductory story I wrote for my CITY WEDDING series down. That was a big decision for me. It continues to be downloaded and downloaded – which is, I guess, testament to what a nice cover and a decent product description for your genre can do for you. Not to mention “free” status. This story was written to introduce the upcoming series though – and it’s failed utterly to generate interest in the series. (At least, as far as sales of the novel are concerned.) So, essentially, it’s not doing me a bit of good sitting there. I think I can use it in a different way. (More on that in a minute.) So I’m pulling it, at the end of the month.
at this rate — I ate at a huge restaurant that must
3 – Keep the dirty jokes and inappropriate comments for the bachelor and bachlorette parties.
-Opponent doesn’t feel happy about their kill
Now that time has come.
A tingling sensation ran through his spine.
Here’s the deal: Awhile ago, we got our third game signed entitled But Wait, There’s More! It was a fun party game about matching benefit cards to item cards to come up with brand new inventions that you then had to pitch to the other players. We had a contract signed and everything. We were ready to get going on development, but then fate stepped in. Wearing combat boots.
Sorry, I've been really busy these few days and should continue into next week. Please do not call my mobile during working hours as i wont be able to answer your calls.
Since it's the giving season.... The Doc was trolling some of Jeff's old posts. Going back to the 2006 Holiday Beer season. In keeping with our ongoing banter, Doc submits these Beervana treats of beer evaluation. Who loved ya baby! ;-)
– NBA players, past or present, who attended The Citadel: 0
Why you decided to leave.
But we wanted to wander a bit, so we headed out to the Teutonia Männerchor club, a couple blocks away. Eric's a member (though he had to get caught up on his dues before we could get served; oh, that never happens at PA clubs...), and we dutifully had one bottle each of Penn Pilsner (long the flagship, and still over half of brewery sales, its proportion slipping (though total sales are going right up), and it's probably because craft beer drinkers are getting more savvy and more demanding)). Then we switched to Spaten Pils, and I bought us a round of Jameson (because I was pumped about Irish whiskey that week), and we talked...but hey, that's just stuff. I went back to the Priory, and went to bed...
I suppose my most common prayer over the years is to lead me not into temptation and keep me.
Who will buy this wonderful feeling?
Part of me thinks there isn’t one: there really is an attack of jerking knees taking place, in which the two wild animals involved are reduced to their comfort zones – bossing other folks around, and making money whatever the social cost, respectively. But this doesn’t explain any more than, say, 25% of what’s going on.
The eleventh page of this paper provides me with the full answer. The First Lady, Nadine Heredia, inaugurated a program where she invited children to the palace for breakfast and to have a tour of the place.
2 rear
What we know as the culture wars and political correctness could not have made progress if it had not been adopted by the popular musicians of the 1960s. The words to The Beatles hit Get Back were developed from a spoof of Enoch Powell's Rivers of Blood speech. Paul McCartney later turned into a more conventional rock song.
Did you submit to agents and publishers?
Matthew 11: 10 (NKJ) For this is he, of whom it is written, Behold, I send my messenger before thy face, which shall prepare thy way before thee.
i feel like she is a newborn again, only worse, because while i am laying there on the ground she is walking on me, screaming and pulling my hair.
I wanted a slip from all her flowers. I imagined the yard of my grown self. It looked just like hers, the lilacs in exactly the same spots, the iris in a bed out front, surrounded by river rock, the mock orange at each corner of the property, their sweet fragrance carried to the center of my home by a spring breeze. On Mother’s Day, I’d take out the hanging baskets from my earth floor basement around back of the house and fill them with potting soil, then add the salmon colored sultana, water their roots, and hang the baskets from eye hooks my grandpa would place around my front porch for me. My imagination did not wander far from the reality I knew as a child at my grandmother’s. My mother and I lived in an apartment with a parking lot instead of grass. We didn’t have flower beds like Grandma.
The prime minister intimated that he is ready to call polls anytime now, joking at Umno’s 66th anniversary on Friday about asking the Agong to dissolve Parliament the next day, the next month or any other month.
Ed more or less avoided me for the next 3 months. Right before I turned 18, I got another job at different insurance company office. This time I was a file clerk. (I know, it really pays to aim high.) We worked on Worker's Comp stuff and it was actually pretty interesting. Plus, unlike the first insurance firm where the average age for employees was about 60, everyone at this place was young! I met and moved in with some girls from the office who were looking for another housemate.
I was stunned.
Then Fred picks up Ted by the throat, drops him, gets hit in the head with a hammer, stabs Ted in the gut with a pitchfork (that actually looks as if it were an effect borrowed from a student film), Ted dies (and doesn't come back to life or as a ghost because that would just be silly) and the story ends.
I know I know, it's just that I forgot my bag and I don't have any money at all on me.
How can you injure your leg? There are many ways that you can hurt it. You could hurt it while playing sports like football, basketball, soccer, skiing, or hockey.
Here are a few CT pages to get your creative juices flowing..
~Cambria
And I will tell, what I would always tell to you
“Darrelle is actually below agreement, inch Tannenbaum stated during the time. “Darrelle is actually a very essential portion of all of us. Functioning toward the actual this time of year as well as ideally achieving lots of excellent points with each other. inch
August ’10 21 GSA employees attended a conference planning meeting at the M Resort.
The program gives participants the opportunity to create and support local green economy projects while acquiring skills and strategies that empower them as agents of Solutionary change wherever they go
I don’t know if this philosophy will work for every writer, but it’s working for me so far. Back in the days of yore, there was a band called .38 Special, as in the pistol. They had a hit song with the lyrics “hold on loosely, but don’t let go.” Maybe that, in a nutshell, is the best way to have writing goals without them making you crazy.
For shall we not allow that the choosing out of those |410 still faithless and astray to obedience to God is the work of the highest love of all? But this is undeniable. And Paul hastened to do this when he said: We are ambassadors therefore on behalf of Christ, as though God were entreating by us: we beseech you on behalf of Christ, be ye reconciled to God. So also does Peter, saying boldly to the Jews: And now, brethren, I wot that in ignorance ye did it, as did also your rulers. Repent ye therefore and be baptized every one of you in the name of our Lord Jesus Christ. You see then how and with what zeal they meet those who have not believed, and bring to them the word which they have not sought, not making it necessary for these in their ignorance to choose themselves as their teachers, but anticipating in this even him who has as yet been unwilling to learn any elementary truth.
In fall of 2009, my friend Karly Kirkpatrick chose self-publishing and she brought me on board with her.
The Fist Fokkers
“And what about Lulu?” I asked, needing a quick fix of Lulu. It had been a while.
I've never punished you before. I never knew quite how to proceed but if ever there was a time Jillian Bea this is it.
We wish everyone a safe and successful summer and we look forward to receiving our SIA volunteers in Peru and Ecuador.
The rains of temptation boasts its strength
301 whole lotta love
Now, enjoy a few pictures...
The featureless corridor, hewn from sandstone and gritty to the touch, sloped ever downwards while curving in a spiral that sent her deeper underground with every step. Tendrils of sand fell from hairline cracks, making the floor treacherous, but her long legs sped her journey downwards without difficulty. Behind her, the cavalrymen lit a lamp to help guide them through the darkness, but Sharia relied on her senses and stayed well ahead of the light they cast, fumbling through the dark descent. It was a test of courage, and if she could best them, she might live.
This novel is a textbook example of how historical fact and fiction should meet in a seamless, agreeable balance, so that one does not outweigh the other. Moreover the characters are well developed, and as far as I could determine, historically accurate. I rate is fairly-well faultless. Five bees.
“Give me a sword and I’ll deal with them.”
2 (1-pound) flank steaks, trimmed
-Yojimbo, 1961
If you shall see Him
This may seem weird to you… you may be thinking “I want him to want me. How can I not have any expectations”. Well, think about it for a second. When we get attached to something or have expectations (thinking about how you’ll spend your 1 year anniversary, planning trips in your head, fantasizing about getting along with his family) you are putting the cart before the horse. You are becoming emotionally invested and everyone wants to see their investment pay off! When you want to see your investment pay off you are more likely to start doing things and trying to make things happen! You pretty much start acting like the opposite of the cool girl – the desperado! And if/when the relationship fails you lose the outcome! So, how do you get to know someone without getting attached? Simple, you enjoy the process and stop harping on the outcome! Enjoy the interaction for what it is (be open, share of yourself) and accept the other person’s presence as a gift as a moment in time. Enjoy actually getting to know the guy and be okay with the idea that it could only temporary. (a side note: By not sleeping with a guy very early it is much easier to do this as sleeping with someone *especially someone you like* creates an attachment, like it or not)
The four cranes are all near each other, walking on the ridge line of a slight sage covered rise on the far side of the pond. Snow beyond silhouettes their graceful postures.
Work. Sleep.
Whoops, forgot to update every minute detail about my life over the past week or so - are you terribly sad? Can you find it in your heart to forgive me?
Please read the background information and proposed program schedule. If you wish to apply, please complete the online Expression of Interest form by close of business on Tuesday 24 May. Students who are short-listed will be invited to attend a group interview on their campus during the week of 30 May (Week 13). Applicants will be notified by 10 June as to whether they have been successful.
I agreed.
When ‘the boy on the phone‘ left Brisbane for good, I was beside myself to the point where I hurt. There was so many regrets; things I never said, stupid things I had said, and the way we had left the situation made me feel hopeless. Plus, I was torn between giving him a chance to settle him before I really spoke to him about how I felt. I literally felt like I had to do SOMETHING with myself, or I was going to go crazy.
Jang Dong-gun, indisputably one of the biggest stars in Korea (think George Clooney — no one ever argues that he is not a good actor or not good-looking or that almost everyone loves him or that he is an icon), has made the bold decision to make a comeback to the land of television dramas after more than a decade.
This is not a new idea, but it’s one every writer should consider. I don’t want to bore my readers and I certainly don’t want my writing to fall flat because I chose to use a cliché instead of conjuring something original.
"I NEED OUR HELP WITH A PROJECT. IT WILL BE THE ADVENTURE OF A LIFETIME-OF SEVERAL LIFETIMES. BUT IT WILL CHANGE YOU FOREVER."
5) The ending. It's...perfect. Just the right hint of more to come. Yes, were a sequel to hit the shelves, I would be first in line!
and Paul Tiessen, Wilfred Laurier University
People talk about being “light” and what I’m referring to is your mood or your attitude.
There are some I just refuse to ride anymore.
Next, create the file jingle.conf (touch /etc/asterisk/jingle.conf) but don’t put anything in it. If it already exists, use an editor to make sure every line inside is commented out (with a semicolon at the start of the line) or remove it.
It’s challenge time again with my friends over on the CCEE Stampers challenge blog. This week our April challenge hostess Cindy Haffner brings us her second challenge for the month.
49 Select the Text tool (T) again. Make sure that you have selected Dynamic text. Make the same choices for this tool as you did earlier in step 25, with one change: select the Multiline option, NOT the Single line one.
Bond developed again in the 80s and wrote a trilogy of war plays: Red, Black and Ignorant(1983); The Tin Can People(1984) and Great Place(1985). He depicts a grim world after a nuclear war. He imagines the moral challenges to humanity of the survivors and the repressive regime that might have to be inaugurated to husband scarce resources. He takes us into the future. He has an extraordinary range from working-class dialogue in Saved, Restoration, a grim but witty, parody of Restoration Comedies. The first part is in the style of Restoration Comedy, but the second is in The Industrial Revolution and this is cast as a parody of 19c Melodrama.
So after settling back in, we got a summons from Tyro the dwarf merchant wanted to see us about a job that he needed done. All hush-hush and such. So me and the boy went back to the group, picked them up and headed off to talk to a dwarf. I’m starting to get annoyed by dwarves.
Aspen: We have one available, would you like a tour?
AND YET GATHERING TOGETHER ALL THE DIVERS PORTENTS THIS MONTH IS BAFFLING EVEN THE MOST ADVANCED AMONG OUR MODERN ASTROLOGERS
Bike to the Ball Park from Sun King
Some of the latest groundbreaking medical information out from some of the leading holistic practitioners in the world are realizing that the traditional western medical professionals have totally missed the boat. And I firmly agree with this new info that has all kinds of proof showing us that 95% of all disease and illness is environmental. We bring it on ourselves by lowering our immune system with an unhealthy lifestyle.
Before meeting my hubby, I had never thought to have my own house built from the ground up. However when we were watching an episode of a home improvement show which was featuring log cabin house, that spurred our imaginations as to what features we wanted in our own house. We were enchanted by the romantic aspect of the cozy log cabin aspect of a home but now at this time in my life, I’m in the home that I love which is an old square saltbox house in Blandford. There it is in the picture.
3, Stir through the coriander, chilli and season to taste.
At least a dozen characters,
Growing up I couldn't get enough bloody beheadings on cable while on Sundays was KTLA's "Family Film Festival" that showcased everything from Universal monster movies, epic Ray Harryhausen adventures, classic sci-fi — and the occasional Doris Day flick. I wasn't any different than the other kids my age (although talking about the crucifix-as-dildo scene in the Exorcist got me booted from Sunday School), but like video games and comics, some kids grow out of it and some don't. Thank Satan and all who bathe in his glory I never did.
Gordon ‘free dinners’ Matheson so often mocked by the SNP as ‘doing a wonderful job for us’ rose to the challenge and smashed the SNP's Z list candidates, they were outfought, outclassed and rejected by the people.
the cold weather knocking at my door,
Pazars are great. They are the open air markets that sell fruits, veggies and household stuff like slippers, pots and pans, etc. There is a large one I got to on Sundays, however I saw a smaller one today in a different neighborhood. Pazars are not normally mid-week so I decided to stop by.
― Eckhart Tolle
Last night Nicole & I settled into a cafe for what ended up being five hours, which passed with incredible speed. As the sky started to darken, I remember just sitting there, taking a breath – allowing the sweet scent of the cigarettes of the man sitting in the seat a row back from us to fill my lungs, to hear the cars going past, the grind of the coffee machine & clink of cafe plates; a background to the chatter of people around us – & being in the moment. I haven’t felt that in so long. We sat with pens & textas & paper & scissors all around us, colouring, writing, gluing & creating. The end result is letters to other eating disorder patients worldwide; those who follow the #recoveryninjas on twitter. Doing positive, making positive from a really shitty life experience.
An article catches Ellie’s eye: those running for city council. Ellie wonders why there are no women running. She gets huffy trying to defend womanhood as Andy tells her she’s taking it too personal.
We looked to create three to four minute pop songs de-constructed from Melody into ‘NOISE’.
04-Someday After A While
Preheat the oven to 450 degrees and position a rack in the middle.
We left the market talking about and making plans for how we can work with with our students and other local families to build more gardens, create more vendors for the market, and support youth entrepreneurship.
Scottish beauty Serena MacGregor’s hatred of all English began as a child when she watched as a band of Englishmen attacked her mother. Her brother’s friend Brigham Langston was no exception to Serena’s loathing-despite his supposed loyalty to the Scottish cause…and his good looks.
TTFN and Happy Crafting!
Eleven Fun Facts About Me:
Ok, I am officially going crazy over the Designer Series Paper in the new catalog. I broke open my pack of Berry Blossoms for this week's Pals Paper Arts sketch challenge. It's so fun and summery!
But look-it-here! Ruff Ryders ain’t got nothing on Organization XII
“Why me?”
Below are the links to some creative bloggers I follow. Enjoy!
It’s important to note that Gun Free South Africa started its offensive against gun ownership by convincing businesses or other organizations to declare their property “gun free.” The businesses certainly had the right to choose to do so, but they ended up becoming pawns in GFSA’s long-term campaign to destroy all choice about gun ownership and to make the entire nation of South Africa “gun free.” Or rather, “free” only of guns owned by law-abiding citizens.
This isn't Mike's case, and yet the Paperback Book-X-Change is never empty. It is never full, either --not that it could accommodate too many people at once-- but I've never been there and not seen at least one person in the store with him, and several come and go during the time I am there. Who knows --he might not be able to keep the store if he didn't also live in it, but the fact is that he's doing something right and the store, in its own way, thrives.
In a large mixing bowl with an electric mixer, cream the butter, beating on low speed until very light and fluffy, about 1 minute. Add the two sugars to the butter and beat on medium speed for 1 minute until very light and creamy. Scrape down the bowl and add the eggs one at a time, beating until completely combined after each addition. Blend in the vanilla extract.
One thing I’m sure of. We’re leaving Comcast only because Comcast first left us.
Hats. Hats are good. Small. Quick. Portable. Plenty of options for different yarns. Yessir, hats are the ticket. And it just so happens, I have a whole bunch of new patterns to pre-process before starting this year's frenzied Giftmas knitathon:
you could bring it in a glass.
I think I'd like it better if I were to gold-leaf it, but the dark espresso frame makes it look like it's swimming in a giant sea of wall. I think I prefer it better in the little nook leading to the master bedroom:
My Favorite Thing This Week: I think my favorite thing this week was our Dr. Seuss day. We had so much fun and the kids drawings turned out amazing!
You’re being scammed and robbed at almost every turn by your Reps and Senators and President. Wake up. Demand more transparency and accountability. It’s late. There is not much time. 42 cents. Can you do that on your credit card for long?
Another fine sunny day in Seattle, so I decided to catch a ferry over to Bremerton. A nice town, which has the Puget Sound Navy Museum (a small but excellent museum on the historic and current operations of the US Navy in this region) and is also home to the US Navy Base – Kitsap which has the mission of being the home port of navy assets in the West Puget Sound area (surface fleet including the nuclear powered aircraft carrier USS John C. Stennis CVN-74 and nuclear submarines such as USS Seawolf SSN-21 a fast attack submarine).
Same old smell, the very same,
This letter is great, because it is so true. I have not been to Library School myself (and somehow manage to perform my job) but I imagine that they don’t tell you about kids tracking poop through the Children’s Room, women having miscarriages in the bathroom, skateboarders walking in to the library in shock and covered in blood, teens putting a strange – and still unidentified – jelly substance on the light switches, teens making out in the bathrooms, dealing with homeless people or the various bodily fluids you will personally be cleaning up yourself.
So it was as if they (the souls) said (as regards the above Verse): This is for us in the Hereafter and there is nothing for us in this world. Then Allah saw said:
I'm really looking forward to it.
We weren’t of course. We went to parties, drank alcohol, had premarital sex and wore sexy clothes. I wonder how many of us didn’t resist or report a rape because we thought we deserved it. Some how. And then eventually convinced ourselves that it wasn’t really rape, that we ‘consented’.
Dads, the second you see your son dropping the limp wrist, you walk over there and crack that wrist. Man up. Give him a good punch. Ok? You are not going to act like that. You were made by God to be a male and you are going to be a male.
In 1921 she started working with Fields, who sang harmony, played the piano, and did the comedy chores. The pair was married the following year. As a team Blossom Seeley and Benny Fields headlined in Big Time vaudeville throughout the twenties and into the early thirties. George Gershwin wrote a 25 minute jazz opera called “Blue Monday” for them to sing in the 1922 George White’s Scandals. The number was pulled for being too highbrow and debuted with the new title “125th Street” at Carnegie Hall in 1925.
I also created an 85 Pandaren monk and tested the windwalker (DPS) and mistweaver (healer) specs with a few runs of End Time.
I don't know about you, but this Pack Rat can always use more storage space!! So with that in mind, I started looking around the house for some items to hold things for my studio. And I came up with these. Wine crates that I got while I was still working at Sam's Club.
In the prototype stage you will need polymer clay - I use up old early Sculpey stock for my originals. Early Sculpey is really not strong enough for serious jewelry work, but is great for making prototypes.
Mrs. Obama (Rudolph), in an effort to call attention to childhood obesity, creates a Cosby Show-style program about her own family. The opening was just hilarious – when they introduce “Joe Jamal-Biden” and he comes out and dances like a Muppet, I almost burst into tears.
PG: 1.042
Not a another word was uttered by Preston,not a wiggle,not a squirm was made. As we turned to leave I smiled to this wonderful stranger and his wife and mouthed Thank You. They both nodded in complete understanding what their presence,and question had meant to us. I feel certain that this is an everyday occurrence to them.
For this first page I used bv08, rv99 for the background as well as the paper and yr04, yr12, y25, and bv17.
For Nephilim of the first incarnation
1-2 bananas, sliced
Most important, Daughter, is that you never, ever forget that I love, I love, I love you.
Answering question 2 isn’t as straightforward as it may sound. It is not a case of what are the differences between photo 1 and photo 2. As the judge notes, it is possible to “reproduce a substantial part without necessarily producing something that looks similar”.
Then, depending on the success of these 12 stories, I plan to publish them as a collection either through a small press publisher or via self-publishing, along with the e-book.
Recipe -
Favorite non-alcoholic drink : Water
My Appearance: I love that 1) my eyes are lovely and green, 2) I am tall and confident, 3) my fingernails look like a French manicure without me doing anything
This is Kersey in Suffolk then and now - certainly still recognizable as the place in the painting though the large tree has gone and the ever present cars and telegraph pole have appeared - neither improve the view! Most of the cottages have been done up too and have lost some of their charm as a result.
Since I began training I have had shin splints, extremely sore ankles, a broken toe (not anything to do with running, just the hazards of someone who loves to be barefoot!) and now my knee!! It seems every time I make some progress, like increasing my pace or adding a little distance… bam! Something starts to hurt!! I’m beginning to think that maybe jumping into minimalist shoes (again someone who prefers to be barefoot) at 52 might have been a mistake………..
So this Christmas, do something that matters. Be someone's angel. Make a difference.
4. When I was 6, I won the grand prize in the summer reading program at the Mesa Public Library. What did I win? $50 to Toys R' Us and my picture in the newspaper. I was pretty sure I was famous!
Finally, although the big number in the news is 30 million, there is no guarantee that that amount will be supplied. The process in the past has been to invite bids from private companies to sell the crude. In 2005, after the disruption caused by Hurricane Katrina, the US government made available 30 million through a similar ‘notice of sale’. They received 14 bids, of which only 5 were accepted and in the end, resulted in total sale of only 11 million barrels of oil.
Lancome Virtuose Mascara in Black
So I put it to my students. I asked them to free-write on something that makes them wonder. And, of course, the things they came up with were also like seeing the world again, for the first time–surprising and complex. One complained about traffic, another talked about how being a twin was a blessing and a curse. The third, who shared, was a young man I’ve had trouble reaching because his false sense of confidence is aggressive and affected and I don’t really know how to approach him. He wants attention but doesn’t work hard at much of anything in my class. Anyway, he doesn’t understand how the most beautiful women always think they are ugly, not skinny enough, or good enough. The whole class took a tense breath. I asked a few questions. And then, I had to hit them with the word “patriarchy.” That you can be a college student and not know that word also amazes me but it says much about the demographic I am working with.
I want to thank EVERYONE who played around with my October Color Challenges - I know some of them were a bit tricky, but those who played TRULY impressed us, and we're always so pleased when our challenges INSPIRE you! Some of you left us some terribly sweet feedback, for which we are very grateful. Your kind words keep us going, and going, and going, so you won't be rid of us Dollies for a while! :)
While Watson’s motivations behind the commission are unclear, six years after the painting shocked London viewers, he entered politics. An entry into this sphere brought with it the usual drawbacks of politically-motivated derisive commentary from his peers. The Rolliad (1812), a British satirical publication designed to poke fun at politicians, penned this scathing critique of Watson and the story that made him famous:
And I’m enjoying this ride no end.
Politics. Whatever we thought at the time, the Crimea isn’t a war of which we can be proud. There’s the evil taint of colonialism hanging over it, an attempt to prevent Russia’s power extending into Afghanistan and ultimately India. It was a stupid and avoidable war, and we made a horrible mess of it. The legend of Florence Nightingale only reminds us of the horrific neglect to which our soldiers were subjected, while the Charge of the Light Brigade only recalls the blunders of commanders who sent men unnecessarily to their deaths. If we think about the Crimea at all, the only thing we feel now is shame.
My Mind's Eye - Stella Rose cut 3.25x6.0 - ends rounded
for that every day. It was still very, very unusual for the father to
I was due in London in the evening for a meet up with friends so I stopped at the motorway services to change. And of course to get some chocolate to steady my jangled nerves. Whilst I was trying to decide - went for a couple of Twirls in the end - and my mobile went. It was the bloke I had just spent an hour being interrogated by. "Blimey" I thought, "that was quick. They've decided against me already". But I was bloody shocked to hear him saying I had the job.
Favorite color: Green
Alex remembered it as a summer of walking miles through the city, lingering over meals at restaurants, hanging out at their apartments, visiting art museums, and talking about life. She recalled one intense conversation in particular as they stood outside the Metropolitan Museum of Art. Obama was obsessed with the concept of choice, she said. Did he have real choices in his life? Did he have free will? How much were his choices circumscribed by his background, his childhood, his socio-economic situation, the color of his skin, the expectations that others had of him? How did choice influence his pres­ent and future? Later, referring back to that discussion, he told Alex in a letter that he had used the word “choice” “as a convenient shorthand for the way my past resolves itself. Not just my past, but the past of my ancestors, the planet, the universe.” His obsession with the concept of choice, he said in a later interview at the White House, “was a deliberate effort on my part to press the pause button, essentially, and try to orient myself and say, ‘Okay, which way, where am I going?’ ”
We (my husband, but I agreed) decided to take the small back roads heading northwest, into the Luberon. This is a better way to enjoy Provence. The autoroute (interstate) is faster, but you don't get to sight-see at 130 km/hour. We live right on the famous National 7 highway that runs from Paris to Nice, so that's always our starting point for a road trip. I think this is one of the most scenic routes in France, although what catches my eye might not catch yours.
Mikkeller Sorachi Ace
No I didn’t. Not true. I said I rarely went out and, other than two occasions which I’ll describe later, I didn’t meet men - repeatedly, in response to the increasingly probing questions about my love life.
(I've gotten used to my papers blowing in the breeze.)
He was my childhood hero. I first fell for him when a schoolfriend put a souvenir programme into my hands and I saw a picture of him singing “Yesterday” at the Royal Variety Command Performance, a few years after that performance.
like if I buy 20,000yen jacket in 109, then I just use it only 3-4times but they just take it at 500yen or more less.
Westpac are being bastards.
Cravings I couldn't resist: Beer!
Math is one of my favorite subjects to teach, and for years I've preached the importance of making sure that ALL students learn their times tables. A few years ago, I wrote Mastering Math Facts, a system for motivating students and teaching them their math facts quickly and easily. It's been so gratifying to hear from teachers what a difference this program has made in their classrooms!
After a long day of driving to Liberty and going to a 6 year old's birthday party, we stopped off at Tipsy's for some recovery supplies. A quick peak through the selection and I found my prizes, 2 new beers from the brewer that is rising quickly up my charts, Lagunitas. I got a bomber of the Wilco Tango Foxtrot Ale and a sixer of Hairy Eyeball. I was to have a Lagunitas Saturday night which doesn't involve Tony Lamas or eating deviled eggs.
The girls are on holiday at the moment, and I really had planned to document how we spend this precious time.
What could be better than celebrating Halloween with the Maiden of Mirth?...I started this tradition last year and intend on keeping it going for as long as i feel like keeping it going!
Dear Mr. Williams,
07. I'm A Man
Don’t hate Monday. Love your weekend. It’s only 5 days till the next one. I see some people ruining their weekend because they hate Monday. Screw that, I’m going to enjoy the time I have when I have it, instead of waiting for something bad.
They cannot see the sun on high;
Media rights
Next year at the Fringe, he should perform a show comprising multiple characters as a showcase for his immense potential. It would be difficult to pull off because of the costume changes but not impossible.
Here’s her bio:
After researching laundromats for sale, those numbers do weigh themselves out.
1 opinion charged blog buster.
'cuz it's all about money, ain't a damn thing funny
relay for life was humbling. it was humbling to see people come together (most i met for the first time on friday night) rally around our family and support out of their own place with cancer. thank you.
The very competitive nature of mass media ownership helps dominant ideologies prevail — if so many different outlets report the same news item in a nearly identical way, that “spin” can easily gain wide acceptance. Or if stories are reported differently by competing media outlets, but with the same dominant set of presumptions underlying them, those dominant presumptions, products of ideologies widely propagated by elite institutions, similarly serve as ideological reinforcement.
I really feel like a roast dinner now! And I noticed how simple food, a family connection (and a little magic) can go a long way.
You wanna be where you can see,
Another new extra is “On White,” a video essay by film scholar Tony Rayns. He provides backstory to the film. It was the first film Kieslowski had made since The Decalogue (1989). Rayns also provides details on the socio-political conditions in Poland at the time. In White, Kieslowski confronted the changes to the country since the fall of Communism.
I can tell he’s really worried about me. He says it. Jules, Ezra, and Daniel haven’t touched anything since Thursday involving this treasure. They have been taking turns monitoring me, which is silly because they are denying it and I’m fine. They think I might be “infected”. I don’t know what that means. There have been weird emotions going on with us all. We may have all gotten more than we bargained for. I think we are on the brink of a once in a lifetime opportunity.
